  copyright ©1994-now EGBG - martijn
  engelbregt     dutch | english | swedish | hebrew | belgian | finnish | italian | estonian | french | german    The Direct Marketing sector
  regards the telephone as one of its most successful tools. Consumers
  experience telemarketing from a completely different point of
  view: more than 92% perceive commercial telephone calls as a
  violation of privacy. Telemarketers make use of a telescript - a guideline for a telephone
  conversation. This script creates an imbalance in the conversation
  between the marketer and the consumer. It is this imbalance,
  most of all, that makes telemarketing successful. The EGBG Counterscript
  attempts to redress that balance.  Good luck!     View and print the EGBG anti-telemarketing Counterscript as a pdf (download Adobe Reader here for free)   BUY THE BOOK  more
  EGBG work   ABOUT EGBG     copyright
  ©1994-2005 EGBG - martijn engelbregt  nieuwe
  uilenburgerstraat 5, 1011 lm amsterdam, the netherlands, e-mail: info@egbg.nl   phone: 0031.20.6208784, fax:
  0031.20.6209573, mobile: 0031.6.26082709 #^$      Toggle navigation           Home Projects  Privatization Watch Republic Report Multinational Monitor Mapping & Data Multinational Resource Center Essential Books Essential Action  Access To Medicine Taking on the Tobacco Tobacco & Trade Licensed to Kill Inc. IMF & World Bank Archives Contact       Essential Information Over 30 years of encouraging citizen activism. Mission Founded in 1982 by Ralph Nader, Essential Information is a non-profit, tax-exempt organization. We are involved in a variety of projects to encourage citizens to become active and engaged in their communities. We provide provocative information to the public on important topics neglected by the mass media and policy makers.  Essential Information has published the Multinational Monitor Magazine, books and reports, sponsored investigative journalism conferences, provided writers with grants to pursue investigations and operated clearing houses which disseminate information to grassroots organizations in the United States and throughout the world.       Project Updates Republic Report  Republic Report is dedicated to rooting out the corruption that is so corrosive to American values. We investigate and uncover the buying and selling of politicians and of institutions entrusted with upholding the public interest. We expose how big money distorts major policy decisions – harming our economy and our people.  www.republicreport.org Trump Terrible 10: Untruthful Slime Ball Edition Published on 2018-04-18 Trump Terrible 10: Mueller Mueller Mueller! Edition Published on 2018-04-12 As Pompeo Rounds Out Koch Administration, Perils for Climate Change Published on 2018-04-12 Pruitt’s Successes, Like Pruitt’s Offenses, Are Rooted in Corruption Published on 2018-04-11 Senators Demand Probes of For-Profit College Shifts to Non-Profit Published on 2018-04-10    Essential Information           #^$           Welcome to the Guardian. This site uses cookies. Read our policy .    Close            Skip to main content    Advertisement            switch to the International edition     switch to the UK edition     switch to the US edition     switch to the Australia edition     current edition: International edition    The Guardian - Back to home           Support The Guardian   Subscribe   Find a job  Jobs    Sign in    Comment activity    Edit profile    Email preferences    Change password    Sign out     My account   Search      News    Opinion    Sport    Culture    Lifestyle          Show More          News    World news    UK news    Science    Cities    Global development    Football    Tech    Business    Environment    Obituaries       Opinion    The Guardian view    Columnists    Cartoons    Opinion videos    Letters       Sport    Football    Rugby union    Cricket    Tennis    Cycling    F1    Golf    US sports       Culture    Books    Music    TV & radio    Art & design    Film    Games    Classical    Stage       Lifestyle    Fashion    Food    Recipes    Love & sex    Health & fitness    Home & garden    Women    Family    Travel    Money               What term do you want to search?     Search with google        Become a supporter    Subscribe    Sign in/up     My account    Comment activity    Edit profile    Email preferences    Change password    Sign out         International edition     switch to the UK edition     switch to the US edition     switch to the Australia edition        Jobs    Dating    Holidays    The Guardian app    Video    Podcasts    Pictures    Newsletters    Today's paper    The Observer    Digital archive    Crosswords         Facebook         Twitter      Jobs    Dating    Holidays                Activate       October 2014                          Media network blog   MTV is using a teen drama and tech to tackle HIV     Georgia Arnold, SVP for social responsibility at VIMN, talks about how media organisations can change the lives of their audience          Published: 16 Oct 2014      MTV is using a teen drama and tech to tackle HIV                September 2014                          Media network blog   New technology is fuelling the growth of gaming with social purpose     One of the directors behind Grand Theft Auto, Navid Khonsari, explains why he believes that play will be more purposeful in the future          Published: 25 Sep 2014   1    New technology is fuelling the growth of gaming with social purpose                         Media network blog   We can solve the water sanitation crisis, but we need your help             Published: 22 Sep 2014      We can solve the water sanitation crisis, but we need your help                         Media network blog   Net neutrality: why Fight for the Future is hosting Internet Slowdown             Published: 10 Sep 2014   2    Net neutrality: why Fight for the Future is hosting Internet Slowdown             August 2014                          Media network blog   Filming local town hall meetings: a new dawn for transparency?             Published: 28 Aug 2014   1    Filming local town hall meetings: a new dawn for transparency?            Activate 2014   Technology promotes behaviour among children that can be self-revealing             Published: 21 Aug 2014      Technology promotes behaviour among children that can be self-revealing          Media network blog   Regulators must lighten up as they clash with the sharing economy             Published: 18 Aug 2014   5    Regulators must lighten up as they clash with the sharing economy          Media network blog   Why crowdfunding is a viable alternative to capitalism             Published: 5 Aug 2014   1    Why crowdfunding is a viable alternative to capitalism        Advertisement              July 2014                          Media network blog   Wearable technology hasn't taken off in the way it was expected to – why not?      Concerns around cost and style are holding consumers back, plus we already have the perfect device – the smartphone           Published: 31 Jul 2014   6    Wearable technology hasn't taken off in the way it was expected to – why not?                         Media network blog   Activate London 2014: gallery    The Guardian’s Activate London Summit took place on 17 July at LSO St Luke’s to discuss the future of money          Gallery           Published: 30 Jul 2014       Activate London 2014: gallery                         Media network blog   How to open up citizen journalism in Africa beyond the smartphone minority      To have open journalism across Africa we need to be able to reach people even if they have little or no internet access           Published: 9 Jul 2014      How to open up citizen journalism in Africa beyond the smartphone minority                                                 Media network blog   Bitange Ndemo: we can tackle corruption by opening up government data – video     In an interview recorded at Activate Johannesburg, Bitange Ndemo explains why African governments must open up their data           4:31           Published: 7 Jul 2014       Bitange Ndemo: we can tackle corruption by opening up government data – video                Media network blog   Alan Rusbridger in conversation with Nikiwe Bikitsha – video            8:22           Published: 7 Jul 2014       Alan Rusbridger in conversation with Nikiwe Bikitsha – video          Media network blog   How technology is holding governments to account and empowering citizens - video            10:59           Published: 7 Jul 2014       How technology is holding governments to account and empowering citizens - video          Media network blog   The future of journalism in a post-Snowden world - video            7:59           Published: 7 Jul 2014       The future of journalism in a post-Snowden world - video          Media network blog   Bitange Ndemo on the impact of the web at 25 – video            7:22           Published: 4 Jul 2014       Bitange Ndemo on the impact of the web at 25 – video                 Media network blog   Stuff magazine's Toby Shapshak on innovation out of necessity – video            7:19           Published: 4 Jul 2014       Stuff magazine's Toby Shapshak on innovation out of necessity – video          Media network blog   How collaborative credit can heal – rather than just disrupt – capitalism             Published: 3 Jul 2014      How collaborative credit can heal – rather than just disrupt – capitalism                June 2014                          Activate 2014        The role of Africa's fourth generation   Fred Swaniker     Africans today have an obligation to build large-scale prosperity for the first time, but success is not inevitable           Published: 25 Jun 2014   5            Published: 25 Jun 2014   5  The role of Africa's fourth generation                         Media network blog   FundersClub's Alex Mittal: the web will make venture capital more transparent      Increased efficiency and transparency in the venture capital industry will result in greater accountability           Published: 20 Jun 2014      FundersClub's Alex Mittal: the web will make venture capital more transparent            About 267 results for Activate   1  2  3  4  …        next        Topics     Activate Johannesburg    Internet    Activate London    Digital media    Technology startups                    back to top                 become a supporter   make a contribution   securedrop   help     advertise with us   work for us   contact us   complaints & corrections     terms & conditions   privacy policy  cookie policy   digital newspaper archive     all topics   all contributors   Facebook   Twitter       © 2018 Guardian News and Media Limited or its affiliated companies. All rights reserved.                      #^$                              Home      Palante
Documentary     Palante Book     About the
Young Lords    Resources                              The Latino/a Education Network Service  ( LENS )  documents
history, culture and politics of Latino/a communities in the United
States. Through education, community events, workshops, and other
activities, LENS provides information and projects about the
Puerto Rican and Latino/a experience.  !Palante,
Siempre Palante! is a documentary about
the history of the Young Lords. Through interviews with former members
and archival footage, the dynamic and
vibrant story is told. Produced by former member
Iris Morales, the award-winning
film now available on DVD.  At a crossroads
in US history, the Young Lords fought for human
rights of Puerto Ricans and other oppressed people. Known for bold
actions and dramatic protests, they brought attention to the dire
conditions that people were living in the 1960s and 70s paving the way
for progressivel changes .   View clip.    Today more
Puerto Ricans live in the United States than in Puerto Rico - the
struggle continues.   For more information and
to arrange screenings, contact i nformation@palante.org   __________________________________________                           ©  LATINO/A EDUCATION
NETWORK SERVICE,  All rights reserved.            #^$              READ   US Life Histories    International Life Histories       UNDERSTAND   Sociology of Young Adults    Meaning of the Life Histories       INTERACT   Respond    Contribute       CONTACT   Project Director    Site Manager        What 
        is it like to be a citizen at the beginning of the twenty-first century?  With public events and candidates filtered through television, newspapers, 
        and the Web, citizenship can't mirror the ideal from the original democracy 
        of ancient Greece. The experience of today's generation probably doesn't 
        resemble that of the activist ’60s, either.  What does it mean nowadays to be “political”?  This Web page aims to help you find out more—and lets you share 
        your own media life history.   Instructions for writing a life history are available in English, Italian, Spanish, and Portuguese.   #^$                                         Enter search below:                                 Film  In “I Feel Pretty,” Amy Schumer Defeats, Discovers Herself  By Bilge Ebiri          News & Politics  NYCFC Wants Its Own Islanders-Style Stadium Subsidy  By Neil deMause          News & Politics  Trump’s Syrian Dog-Wag Earns Only Light Applause From Right  By Roy Edroso        News & Politics    Washington, D.C.    Healthcare    Education    Sustainability    Technology    Equality                        Food  Taste Soul Food’s History and Future at Butterfunk Kitchen  By Zachary Feldman          Books  An Appetite as Big as the Ritz  By Talia Lavin          Art  8-Ball Community Keeps Downtown’s Artistic Spirit Alive  By Brittany Natale        New York    Media    Neighborhoods    Food    Bars    Style    Living                        Film  In “I Feel Pretty,” Amy Schumer Defeats, Discovers Herself  By Bilge Ebiri          Best of Spring  How Albert Hammond Jr. Became Someone Else and Found Himself  By Ilana Kaplan          Best of Spring  Brooklyn O.G. Tracy Morgan Heads Back to the Neighborhood to Host a Block Party  By Rebecca Smeyne        Film    TV    Music    Theater    Art    Books    Dance                                                          About Us    Staff    Jobs    Contact Us    Privacy    Terms of Use                        News & Politics  Tech Wars in Meat Space   by Erik Baard   July 31, 2001                                   Illustration by George Bates     When Carlo Giuliani’s rage at the new world order turned violent during the recent G-8 summit in Genoa, he was hit with an old-fashioned response: two bullets that ripped through his head. Police forces are asking themselves if that kind of death is an inevitable part of street clashes, or if high-tech nonlethal weapons could offer a way out.   Police in the future may be armed with energy beams that inflict a burning sensation on skin without causing permanent damage, or even painlessly and temporarily immobilize a rioting demonstrator. Waves of sound and light could disorient mobs, and sticky foam could trap them like flies on a strip.  “As things stand, if you dropped Wyatt Earp into today’s world he’d be pretty comfortable,” says Captain Charles “Sid” Heal, a nationally regarded nonlethal-weapons guru with the Los Angeles County Sheriff’s Department. But Earp’s bullets aren’t the answer to every breach of code, he says. Save them for a time when inaction will cost a life, and consider even that a failure for not acting nonlethally, sooner.   Activists worry that cops with gentler means of crowd restraint will be more likely to nip protests in the bud, preventing any message from getting out. Already, demonstrations have been wrecked and people injured by tear gas and rubber bullets.   “The increasing popularity of less lethal weapons is a two-edged sword,” says David Jackson, a spokesman for CopWatch.com , a Web site dedicated to tracking police abuses. “On the one hand, their use causes far fewer deaths than the use of traditional firearms. On the other hand, the perception that they are ‘nonlethal’ results in their indiscriminate or improper use to a far greater degree than such use of traditional firearms.”   That’s not a bad thing, according to Colonel Andrew Mazzara, director of the U.S. Marine’s Institute for Emerging Defense Technologies at Pennsylvania State University. “I would assume and hope that the ‘trigger’ would be pulled sooner than a lethal weapon,” he says.   Faced with that hard line, rabble-rousers are piling gadgets into their own box of tricks. Protesters now have robots that can graffiti public spaces at lightning speed. The technology exists for real flying saucers to project laser messages onto the sides of buildings or display text on their underbellies with light-emitting diodes.   The Institute for Applied Autonomy, the techno-artist collective that makes the remote-controlled GraffitiWriter, sees nothing ahead but growth. “[T]he IAA has identified the already emerging market of cultural insurrection as the most stable market in the years to come,” says their Web site. “IAA research has examined the primary behavior patterns of this market and is developing technologies that best serve the needs of the burgeoning market.”    The term “nonlethal” is a goal, not a guarantee, because these weapons can be deadly if used carelessly. Heal counts 11 deaths from bean-bag rounds in North America alone. That’s what scares activists. “Ill-trained, overzealous, angry cops frequently use pepper spray as an impromptu, ‘officially sanctioned’ form of torture,” says Jackson of CopWatch.com. Likewise, firehoses and truncheons have broken bones.   Modifications to these weapons on the Penn State radar include a water cannon made by Jaycor that can deliver an electric charge. New sensors on muzzles can slow projectiles when a target is too close for safety. Another new projectile is the Sticky Shocker, a battery-powered device that clings to its target’s clothing with glue and barbs, delivering an incapacitating electric charge. There are even billy clubs that fire soft projectiles and ensnaring nets.   Streams of gluey foam, like a souped-up version of the party favor Crazy String, can also immobilize suspects or create barriers. That was done by marines in Somalia, who created perimeters of the foam to block mobs as UN forces withdrew. Problem was, those barriers were easily bridged by laying down planks of wood and sheets of plastic.   Small explosives that deliver a burst of shockwaves can be used to disorient an entire crowd, as can LE Systems’ handheld “Laser Dazzler,” which is essentially over-stimulating rave gear that could have been designed by Dr. Evil. Some speculate that infrasound assaults of low-frequency waves could confuse people and if applied in greater doses will produce vomiting, diarrhea, deafness, and death.   A nonlethal-weapons laboratory may sound like another Tower of London, but any of these ideas might have spared Carlo Giuliani’s life. “The standard is not perfection,” Heal says. “The standard is the alternative”—death by gunshot. “Our immediate retort is, What would you rather be shot with?”   Still, he knows that standards within police forces don’t match the layman’s ideal. “Everything changed on a Thursday night in 1966,” he says. “When Star Trek first aired and the phaser entered the public psyche, it set the standard whether we liked it or not.” He’s serious. “The phaser as conceived on Star Trek is portable. It discriminates, meaning you can target one individual without affecting another. It’s reusable and environmentally benign. It defeats the will and the ability to resist, and the guy recovers with no aftereffects. It just makes people after nonlethal tools drool,” says Heal.     The federal government has Kirk envy, too. Air force research labs announced in March the creation of a beam weapon that caused a target to feel burning pain—as if one had touched a hot light bulb—but without causing permanent damage. Only the top 1/64th of an inch of the skin is affected, according to the air force. Oak Ridge National Laboratory is developing another beam that goes to the core, raising body temperature and provoking a debilitating fever of up to 105 degrees. Other national labs have worked toward developing beams that induce grogginess or small seizures.   An outfit called HSV Technologies in San Diego claims it’s developing something more benign and truer to the spirit of a Star Trek phaser set on stun. “We’re on the verge of changing the world as we know it,” says Eric Herr, HSV vice president for research. The company’s real-life phaser would shoot two weak ultraviolet beams at its target, ionizing two channels through the air. A small charge of electricity at a pulse rate that mimics nerve signals would trace them as if they were wires, in fractions of a second. A person struck by the beams would complete a circuit with the phaser and be instantly immobilized as the skeletal muscles froze up, tricked into reacting as if the brain were ordering them all to contract at once. Whole crowds could be stilled by a beam from a hovering helicopter, he notes.   “No pain, no shock, no sensation whatsoever,” Herr says. Power would have to be increased 150 times before the phaser could induce a fatal heart attack, Herr says. “I would be disappointed if it were used as a means of killing other human beings, but we cannot control how governments behave.”   Even if the technology isn’t perverted into a lethal tool, it might be exactly the kind of convenient weapon that would make it all too easy for cops to quell justifiable unrest in the name of maintaining cosmetic order.   Colonel Mazzar dismisses that worry, saying nonlethal weapons don’t threaten the right to protest. “It is the exploitation of perceived civil liberties which extends into violence and puts innocent lives and property at risk that ultimately leads to such hindrance,” he says. “I would trust the judgment of trained law-enforcement professionals trying to maintain public order and public safety over that of a younger, immature, less circumspect agitator.” In other words, the kids aren’t all right.   Captain Heal used to think the same way before he started boning up on sociology, especially the work of Clark McPhail, author of The Myth of the Madding Crowd . Now Heal fears that a “dream” weapon like the phaser might ultimately lead to greater bloodshed. With an eye to ’60s-era civil rights protests and today’s Palestinian struggle, Heal asks, “Are we sealing off the safety valve? Riots tend to bring issues to the forefront that would have become the cause of a full-blooded revolution. If there’s no riot, the safety release is not there.”   The idea of giving protesters leeway was hard for Heal to swallow. “For me to shift my paradigm after 25 years in law enforcement was almost a nervous breakdown,” he reflects.      Protesters aiming to give politicians a nervous breakdown are turning increasingly to new technologies, beyond the hacktivism of defacing Web sites and e-bombing a corporation’s inbox. The Institute for Applied Autonomy makes robots to stage protests where a human might be in danger or too restricted. The collective also has an anthropomorphic pamphleteer called “Little Brother” that hits passersby with protest literature. It’s intentionally designed with a disarming cuteness that George Lucas or Steven Spielberg could love. All that’s missing is a “We Shall Overcome” MP3 file.   At the last Davos, Switzerland, economic meeting, protesters projected their sentiments in laser light across a mountain face by typing messages into www.hellomrpresident.com .   Remote-controlled flyers like the saucer-shaped Draganflyer made in Canada have been eyed as vehicles for toting banners, projecting images, and carrying wireless cameras. That would make it a good platform for what activists call “digital witnessing,” sending images via satellite to webcasters for worldwide viewing, bypassing corporate media. The human and environmental rights group AmazonWatch says the tools it has given native peoples for digital witnessing may already be restraining companies and governments in the region, but can do little against secretive vigilantes.   The Ruckus Society is opening a Tech Toolbox Action Camp in October to train activists in new technologies and to pool together experts. But program director Han Shan warns against developing a fetish for electronic toys. Basic things like text messaging, micro-radio broadcasting, and e-mail to Palm Pilots have already made street organizing far more effective, he observes.   Still, one can take technology so far that protests become a bloodless ritual, a meaningless Kabuki. Imagine the Washington Mall filled with angry citizens shoulder-to-shoulder, fists raised high with righteous anger—all holograms projected by people safely in their living rooms. Think that’s absurd? The folks at www.whitehouseprotests.com will, for a fee, carry your banner and chant your slogan in the capital, and send you a photo of the day’s events.   “Robots and flying machines are fanciful and interesting, but there’s simply no replacement for human bodies on the street to show our power in numbers and for being radically nonviolent. The purest way of people communicating their outrage is putting themselves in harm’s way,” Shan says. You have to be willing to “throw [your] body like a monkey wrench into the machine to say, ‘No more!’ “     More: Carlo Giuliani Han Shan Institute for Applied Autonomy Longform Wyatt Earp                Most Popular             Best of Spring    The Day Garry Shandling Tried to Talk Sense to Ricky Gervais   by  Simon Abrams               Best of Spring    The Exceptionally Varied Gems of This Year’s Tribeca Film Festival   Our critics recommend the documentaries, genre pieces, and literary studies to seek out at the sprawling-as-usual fest  by  Jason Bailey , Tanner Tafelski and Sam Weisberg               Film    Rosario Dawson Goes South in William H. Macy’s “Krystal”   by  Craig D. Lindsey               Film    Meet the Man Who Shot Some of Japanese Cinema’s Greatest Masterpieces   This month, the work of Kazuo Miyagawa gets a major New York retrospective  by  Bilge Ebiri               Film    In “I Feel Pretty,” Amy Schumer Defeats, Discovers Herself   by  Bilge Ebiri               Best of Spring    “Westworld” Is Smarter and Better, but It Demands a Bloody Price   by  Lara Zarum                                  About Us  Staff  Jobs  Contact Us  Terms of Use  Privacy    ©2017 Village Voice, LLC. All rights reserved. |  Site map                     #^$                   List Regions   Add Events   Handbook    |  About Protest.Net   |  Protest News   |  What's New    |  ZMag   |  Index   |  Links      Protest.Net  /  Front Door                 Asia Pacific - Europe   Latin America - Online   North America                   Highlights:    Activists Handbook   Newsletter Subscriptions   What's New   News & Action Alerts   Support Protest.Net   Add An Article   Create Your Own Calendar   Healing from Trauma   G8 Solidarity Protests                  Events By Issue:         Animal Rights  Children & Education  Civil Rights  Death Penalty  Drugs  Elections & Democracy  Environment  Fascism & The Right Wing  Feminism & Reproductive...  Food & Agriculture  Globalization & Imperialism  Human Rights  Immigration & Refugees  Iraq  Labor / Union  Media  Other  Peace  Poverty & Hunger  Prisons, Police & Repression  Race & Class  Religion & Spirituality  Sexuality, Gender, & GLBT  Third World                  Occupy Wall Street      International Days Of Action     March 8   •    Int. Women's
Strike      March 15   •    Day Against Police Brutality      April 17   •    International Day of Farmers
Struggle      May 1   •    May Day: International Workers Day      October 19   •    International Media Democracy
Day       For more major global protests check out the PGA's Actions against Globalization .   The war against terrorism threatens to be an unending war yet we
see little
progress in addressing the actual causes of terrorism, violence, and war.
Join protests to stop the endless war.

 We must stop this war and start
 addressing the real causes of terrorism. "An eye for an eye makes the whole world blind." - Gandhi    Upcoming Events by City:    If you're looking for a ride or are driving somewhere, stop by HitchHikers.org .   Do you wish you had time to write more letters protesting injustice?  Check out the Progressive Secretary , 
				they'll write and send letters
				based on which issues you're conserned about. They're really cool, I've been using them for
				a while and am really impressed with both the quality of the letters and politics behind them.    Protest.Net is a site to help progressive activists by providing a
				central place where the times and locations of protests and meetings can be
				posted. I can't possibly keep up with all the actions, so if
				you find about a protest or meeting, please post that
				information. Feel free to email us, rabble-rouser@protest.net if you have any questions or comments. Don't email us your 3 meg mp3 of your anti-war song or subscribe this address to your annoucement list.  I get over 500 emails a day.             Search:               Protest.Net doesn't necessarily support or endorse any of the events or cause listed on it's calendars.    Feedback      #^$   ✕ What's Happening Highlights CREDO statement on vote advancing coal lobbyist for #2 job at EPA How CREDO Mobile Is Empowering Gun Control Activists To Make Change CREDO is giving away $150,000 to progressive groups this month Joint statement from CREDO, Win Without War and MoveOn: War in Syria is the problem, not the solution  CREDO Action    About Press Victories CREDO Mobile WINNING TOGETHER We are millions of people taking action for progressive change Homepage  71,041 supporters Act Now Tell Democrats: Fight to repeal the Trump Tax…   60,505 supporters Act Now Stop Trump’s march to war in Syria   150,507 supporters Act Now Protect the Mueller investigation   147,903 supporters Act Now Tell Scott Pruitt: Resign   141,633 supporters Act Now Tell the Senate: Block and resist Pompeo  CREDO Facebook CREDOAction Facebook View on Facebook CREDO Mobile  5 hours ago 👏👏👏 ... See More See Less Senate passes resolution allowing Duckworth to bring baby on floor thehill.com The Senate approved a resolution on Wednesday evening to allow Sen. Tammy Duckworth (D-Ill.) — the first senator to give birth while in office — to bring her baby onto the floor. Likes:  294 Shares:  26 Comments:  6  Comment on Facebook How about paid maternity leave for all Americans? Tell me how that gets us there and I’ll be excited. I like Duckworth, but she’s currently privileged, with a team of paid staffers. What’re you doing for ordinary American women? That this has to be voted on in America in 2018? 🙄 in 2018? ridiculous How long before the outrage when she starts feeding the child as nature intended? Good for us! Feels so right! + View more comments CREDO Mobile  6 hours ago 👏 ... See More See Less Stormy Daniels Plans To Donate NDA Money To Planned Parenthood huffingtonpost.com She plans to donate $130,000 in President Donald Trump and attorney Michael Cohen's names, according to a recent report. Likes:  270 Shares:  22 Comments:  9  Comment on Facebook The one where she left Barron's half brother 🥁 You go girl  :) Stormy Daniels has actually figured out a way to look ugly. What exactly is she hoping to get out of this? VERY COMMENDABLE OF HER I believe she's been honest my heart tells me she's telling the truth God bless this Jong lady go them wrong Works for me. MBB BRAVA! I hope this is true. + View more comments CREDO Mobile  7 hours ago This is a great story, but it'd be even better if they also announced they were changing their team name! ... See More See Less Cleveland Indians donate playoff earnings to Puerto Rico hurricane relief thehill.com The Cleveland Indians are donating earnings from their 2017 playoff run to efforts to help Puerto Rico recover from Hurricane Maria. Likes:  164 Shares:  37 Comments:  10  Comment on Facebook Why is it that such examples of charity and compassion can not be found among those elected to be political leaders in this country, especially for fellow American citizens? How sad that Puerto Rico, a U.S. territory, where its citizens pay taxes, has to rely on the generosity of non-government groups and individuals to assist during this devastating time.  How can we say we’re proud of our administration and Congress? So Trump and Congress giv e 1.5 trillion dollars to the rich and big corporations, and leaves Puerto Rico out to starve to death. That is not what a real President does for America's citizen, so a baseball team has to do it instead. Just say thank you and hold the critique fir another day. If true, great people. Beats what our government is doing. And for you people who don't know, the Puerto Rico people are American citizen's. Good for them. Good on them. That is wonderful and generous. Cleveland just gained a fan. Good men. + View more comments Load more CREDO Twitter    What's Happening   Act Now 3 days ago 18,309 supporters Tell border state governors: Don’t help Trump terrorize border communities   3 days ago James Comey on the state of our country    Act Now 3 days ago Tell Toys “R” Us: Employees Deserve Severance Pay    Act Now 3 days ago 23,925 supporters Tell Congress: Support the Dignity for Detained Immigrants Act    Act Now 3 weeks ago 76,586 supporters Tell Facebook: Notify the 50 million people whose data was accessed    Call 2 weeks ago 3,207 supporters Call: Block and resist Pompeo    Act Now 1 week ago 19,338 supporters Tell Congress: Don’t let Trump destroy the CFPB  Campaign Stream  Investigate Trump       February 6, 2018 Tell Congress: Protect the independent investigation into Trump     February 1, 2018 Remove Nunes from the House Intelligence Committee     January 26, 2018 The Senate must investigate: Did the NRA launder money for Russia to help Trump win?     January 20, 2018 We’re not surprised.   Find Out More   Act Now 1 week ago 49,462 supporters Tell Mitch McConnell: Fix Congress’ broken system for reporting sexual harassment and assault   1 week ago Gov. Kate Brown on the National Guard  Campaign Stream  #StoptheNRA #GunControlNow       March 20, 2018 Powerful: Parkland father devotes rest of life to taking down the NRA     March 5, 2018 Tell Congress: Stop taking the NRA’s money     March 5, 2018 Stand with Sen. Warren: Tell investors in gun manufacturers to demand change     February 27, 2018 Emma Gonzalez on gun reform   Find Out More   Act Now 1 week ago 84,902 supporters Tell the U.S. Senate: Block and resist Ronny Jackson. Don’t let Trump privatize the VA.    Act Now 1 week ago 108,550 supporters Tell the Federal Communications Commission: Block the Sinclair deal  CREDO Action Videos  View More Videos Parkland father video Sen. Warren BLASTS Trump-Sessions’ bigotry: “We will persist and we will win” Arming teachers will make students less safe  View More Videos  1 week ago Dan Rather on Sinclair    Act Now 1 week ago 91,907 supporters Tell DHS: End Family Detention    Act Now 1 week ago 112,198 supporters Tell Congress: Don’t destroy America’s largest national forest    Act Now 1 week ago 43,029 supporters Tell TV networks: Stop ignoring climate change    Act Now 1 week ago 69,904 supporters Tell The New York Times: Stop humanizing violent white extremists    Act Now 1 week ago 102,990 supporters Tell DeVos: Stop siding with student loan debt collectors   1 week ago Rep. Joe Kennedy III on Scott Pruitt    Act Now 1 week ago 119,411 supporters Stop Trump from using the census to discriminate    Act Now 2 weeks ago 87,548 supporters Tell First Quantum: Don’t invest in the Pebble Mine    Act Now 2 weeks ago 77,007 supporters Tell Congress: Protect TPS and DED holders from deportation   2 weeks ago Coach Gregg Popovich on point again    Call 2 weeks ago 1,646 supporters Make a call: Shame on the Senate Bailout Caucus    Act Now 3 weeks ago 103,433 supporters Tell Google: Take down deceptive anti-abortion ads now    Call 3 weeks ago 1,646 supporters Make a call: Shame on the Senate Bailout Caucus   3 weeks ago When you ask for a military parade but get a gun control march    Act Now March 19, 2018 110,492 supporters Tell the Senate: No Dow Chemical shills at EPA    Act Now March 19, 2018 132,087 supporters Tell the Senate: No armed federal agents at polling places    Act Now March 19, 2018 73,587 supporters Tell federal regulators: Protect the Volcker Rule    Act Now March 15, 2018 124,180 supporters Tell the Senate: Reject torturer Gina Haspel as CIA director   March 15, 2018 Good point by Rep. Joe Kennedy III.    Act Now March 15, 2018 149,817 supporters Tell Amazon, Apple, Roku: NO NRA TV    Act Now March 15, 2018 115,936 supporters Stand with the Gwich’in: No seismic exploration in the Arctic Refuge    Act Now March 5, 2018 106,346 supporters Tell Congress: Don’t defund cancer research to protect Monsanto    Act Now 2 months ago 13,578 supporters Tell CA lawmakers and Gov. Brown: Expand access to abortion on college campuses    Act Now 2 months ago 96,866 supporters Tell the DHS Office of Inspector General: Investigate ICE   Watch 2 months ago Arming teachers will make students less safe  Campaign Stream  #TrumpParade       February 12, 2018 The #TrumpParade funds could…     February 9, 2018 Rep. Ted Lieu on the #TrumpParade     February 8, 2018 Sen. Cory Booker on the #TrumpParade     February 8, 2018 Sen. Bernie Sanders on the #TrumpParade   Find Out More  Watch 2 months ago Sen. Merkley crushes Trump’s clueless budget director    Act Now 3 months ago 91,660 supporters Tell Congress: Block and resist Trump’s #InfrastructureScam   Watch 2 months ago Washington Gov. blasts Trump’s proposal to arm teachers   2 months ago Elizabeth Warren on Dodd-Frank   Watch 2 months ago Heroic activist calls out corrupt West Virginia politicians to their faces   Watch 2 months ago Rep. Hakeem Jeffries explains treason to Trump    Act Now 2 months ago 105,526 supporters Tell Congress: Protect the independent investigation into Trump    Act Now 3 months ago 109,806 supporters Tell the Senate: Don’t confirm Eric Dreiband as director of the Department of Justice’s Civil Rights Division    Call 3 months ago 1,941 supporters Call key senators: Save net neutrality   Watch 3 months ago #TBT: Obama crushes Trump’s racist anti-immigrant politics, blasts “promises of higher [border] walls    Act Now 4 months ago 195,293 supporters Tell Congress: Save net neutrality    Act Now 3 months ago 108,034 supporters Republicans want to end the investigation into Trump’s Russia ties. We cannot let them.    Act Now 3 months ago 103,342 supporters Tell the Senate: Block Thomas Homan    Act Now 5 months ago 123,418 supporters Stand with Sen. Sanders: Rebuild Puerto Rico    Act Now 4 months ago 201,256 supporters Senate Democrats: Stop the NRA. Block concealed carry reciprocity    Act Now 5 months ago 76,159 supporters Tell the Department of Homeland Security: Extend Temporary Protected Status    Act Now 5 months ago 99,249 supporters Tell Congress: No unauthorized war in North Korea  Campaign Stream  Support Medicare for All       January 24, 2018 Bernie Sanders talks universal Medicare, and 1.1 million people click to watch him     January 23, 2018 U.S. Senator Bernie Sanders hosts a Medicare for All town hall     September 14, 2017 Thank these 16 Senators who are standing up for Medicare for All     September 13, 2017 #FeelTheBern: Sen. Sanders rips Republicans on health care   Find Out More Campaign Stream  Stop advancing Trump’s judges       December 15, 2017 Republican Senator exposes Trump’s clueless and wildly unqualified judicial nominee     October 27, 2017 Sen. Merkley blasts Republicans for undermining Russia investigation: “It’s totally political”     September 20, 2017 Democratic Senator BLASTS Republicans for packing courts with Trump’s judges     September 15, 2017 Trump is rapidly nominating federal judges. Democrats are facing more pressure to not confirm them.   Find Out More   Act Now 6 months ago 104,306 supporters Reject Trump’s coal lobbyist pick at the EPA  Campaign Stream  Support athletes speaking out for justice       November 30, 2017 “If I was walking down the highway with a quarter in my pocket and a briefcase full of truth, I’d be so happy.” – Muhammad Ali, Sports Illustrated, Feb. 19, 1968     October 13, 2017 Sports teams rejecting Trump’s hate     September 27, 2017 #TakeAKnee spreads to the U.S. Congress     September 25, 2017 Congressman schools Trump on patriotism   Find Out More  MORE OF WHAT'S HAPPENING What is CREDO? CREDO Action, part of CREDO Mobile, is a social change network of 5 million activists, sending tens of millions of petition signatures and more than 100,000 phone calls to decision-makers each year. CREDO Action members also participate in meetings, protests and other direct actions for progressive change. Stay in Touch Follow @CREDOmobile on Twitter. Like CREDO Mobile on Facebook. Press Contact Info Josh Nelson, Co-Director press [at] credoaction [dot] com Your Impact  199M+ petition signatures  4M+ calls to leaders  13M+ citizen letters Our Impact in 2017  Together, CREDO members fight for positive change that makes progress possible. From resisting Trump to pushing Democrats to be bold, CREDO members lead on the issues that matter.  View Our Impact in 2017 Our 2017 Donations Progressive change isn’t possible without the amazing work of all the groups fighting for:  That’s why throughout 2017, CREDO Action members voted on which progressive organizations we should donate over $85 million to.  View Our 2017 Donations Start Your Own Campaign  Start your own petition on our people–powered campaign platform  Start your own campaign Our Impact Our 2016 Report View Our Donations CREDO Action Campaigns Victories News and Press About CREDO Action Contact Terms of Use Privacy Policy More from CREDO CREDO Mobile CREDO Mobile Blog CREDO Donations CREDO Action on DailyKos CREDO Action on Medium CREDO Action is a publication of Working Assets credomobile.com                                            #^$    Aid and Relief Awareness for the World  Education, Aid, Human Rights, Environment   Home  e-Volunteer  About    jump to navigation     Poverty: 10 videos, a quotation and a short story  Mon 13-Oct-2008   Posted by Harris G in Aid , ReliefWeb . Tags: blogactionday , poverty  3 comments   Poverty is something we usually don’t want to think or talk about. It is too sad and too uncomfortable for people who have the luxury of reading these lines and not care about if they will eat tonight, where will they sleep or if they will wake up in the morning.  This post is for all the lost and forgotten souls that die every single day, for no reason, and we never know about it. And for all the dedicated people who risk their lives to be there and give one more day to them.  For this year’s Blog Action Day , here is Poverty – in 10 video clips, a quotation and short story.   (more…)    Advertisements    Report this ad   Report this ad     World Environment Day 2008  Thu 5-Jun-2008   Posted by Harris G in Environment , ReliefWeb . Tags: algae , APS , bioreactor , Environment , Greenfuel , WED  add a comment   A lot have happened since the previous post. The earthquake in China was undoubtedly a major disaster for the country and a test for the aid and relief organizations, just like in Myanmar. But today it is the day we all need to be optimistic and hopeful for the future of our planet. We are the only habitants responsible for the current environmental situation and the only ones capable of doing something about it, starting today.  (more…)    Advertisement   Myanmar: a desolate land  Fri 9-May-2008   Posted by Harris G in Aid , ReliefWeb . Tags: Aid , Burma , Darfur , Maynmar , Nargis , UNHCR  add a comment   It seems that every single month of 2008 up to now is marked by a major disaster of global scale. Myanmar is just this month’s feature that will probably be forgotten a month from now (maybe even sooner). On May 3rd, cyclone Nargis hit the country and swept away   (more…)    Earth Day 2008  Tue 22-Apr-2008   Posted by Harris G in Environment , ReliefWeb .  add a comment   Probably a sad day for those who know what is all about. The Earth Day Network has a list of events and petitions, everybody is talking about “green” ways to live, but the truth is nothing has really changed since last year.  (more…)    The whaling continues  Sat 12-Apr-2008   Posted by Harris G in Environment , ReliefWeb . Tags: Esperanza , greenpeace , Nisshin Maru , whaling  2 comments   For those who are very aware of the things and crimes that happen in the oceans of this beautiful planet, the early days of 2008 were marked by the relentless chase that went on in the Southern Pacific. Greenpeace’s ship Esperanza confronted Japan’s flagship Nisshin Maru, the head of a large whaling fleet that was heading towards the southern migration paths of whales at this time of year.   (more…)    A reason for War  Sat 19-Jan-2008   Posted by Harris G in Anti-war , ReliefWeb . Tags: Benazir Bhutto , conflict , Fredric Brown , Kenya , sci-fi , war  3 comments   It seems that the new year is not as promising as we all hoped for. The killing of Benazir Bhutto in Pakistan late December, the civil war that is emerging in Kenya and the countless war victims around the world are not the best start.  (more…)    Christmas for all?  Fri 28-Dec-2007   Posted by Harris G in Aid , ReliefWeb . Tags: children , Christmas , donate  add a comment   I’m not sure when or where I first heard this story, I believe it was in one of Paulo Coelhio’s books:  “When I was young, my father took me to the beach. We were walking along the washing waves on the wet sand. All around us, there were numerous starfishes that were washed ashore and now they were getting dry under the hot morning sun. Then my father knelled down, took a very small starfish inside his hands and placed him very carefully inside a small pocket of water. I asked ‘..Why are you doing this..Soon the waves will wash it off again higher and it will be drying on the sand..What does it matter?..’ He smiled at me like he understands and said ‘..It matters for itself..’ I felt a lump coming up my throat. Suddenly, I wanted to get all those little starfishes in the entire beach and throw them back at the sea, as far as I could. I’ve never forgotten that feeling.”   (more…)    Tar sands and feathers for BP’s Alberta project  Wed 19-Dec-2007   Posted by Harris G in Environment , ReliefWeb . Tags: Alberta , BP , Canada , Exxon-Mobil , oil , oil spill , Shell , tar sands  2 comments   In BP’s website , there is a special section for Environment and Society.  It is part of the company’s recent efforts to re-shape its market view towards the consumers, after a few blows on its image. Who can forget the 270,000 gallons oil spill in the wild tundra of Prudhoe Bay, Alaska last March. But it seems that it’s just that: a marketing scheme.  (more…)    December 5th, World Volunteer Day  Fri 7-Dec-2007   Posted by Harris G in Aid , ReliefWeb , Volunteers . Tags: Africa , famine , hunger , Kevin Carter , pulitzer , volunteer  add a comment   A few days ago, a friend sent me this image by email, along with many others. I was immediately struck by the sight, but then I remembered a few things I’ve heard from CNN’s Anderson Cooper, after his visit in Africa:  “ …These things happen in the world, whether we’re aware of them or not, it’s always there even when we’re not there to see it. We have an obligation to tell their story, tell the world that they exist… “  This is a small token for the World Volunteer Day that went unnoticed on December 5th.  (click to enlarge)       A day full of red ribbons  Thu 29-Nov-2007   Posted by Harris G in Aid , ReliefWeb , Volunteers . Tags: AIDS , HIV , origin , outbreak , prevention , red ribbon  add a comment   In two days, December 1st, the media all over the world will be filled again with those pretty red ribbons, at the edge of a newspaper, on the corner of the TV screen, beside the logo of major websites. It is that special day of every year that many people see it, but don’t realize exactly what it means. Young children may even think that this means Christmas is near!  Unfortunately, it is not so. I mean, yes, the Christmas is near, but not for the whole world. The “Red Ribbon” campaign was inspired some years ago as a motto for global awareness against HIV, a very special and very resilient virus that is haunting the medical community since the early ’80s. Although the first incident of death from AIDS was recorded as the “the Congolese man” in 1959, the AIDS epidemic officially begun on the 5th of June 1981.   (more…)  « older posts     search       About...  PhD researcher, Informatics Systems Analyst (MSc), s/w developer, teacher. Greece.    Recent Posts    Poverty: 10 videos, a quotation and a short story    World Environment Day 2008    Myanmar: a desolate land    Earth Day 2008    The whaling continues    A reason for War    Christmas for all?    Tar sands and feathers for BP’s Alberta project    December 5th, World Volunteer Day    A day full of red ribbons    What is wrong with Greenpeace today?    Volunteering links page on-line    Greener housekeeping solutions for all     Categories  Aid  Anti-war  Education  Environment  ReliefWeb  Rights  Volunteers   Archive   October 2008 (1)  June 2008 (1)  May 2008 (1)  April 2008 (2)  January 2008 (1)  December 2007 (3)  November 2007 (3)  October 2007 (1)    Tags  Africa  Aid  AIDS  Alberta  algae  APS  Benazir Bhutto  bioreactor  blogactionday  BP  Burma  Canada  children  Christmas  cleaning  conflict  Darfur  donate  Environment  Esperanza  Exxon-Mobil  famine  Fredric Brown  Greenfuel  greenpeace  Greenpeace whales whaling iPhone fishing  HIV  housekeeping  hunger  Kenya  Kevin Carter  Maynmar  Nargis  Nisshin Maru  oil  oil spill  origin  outbreak  pesticide  pollution  poverty  prevention  pulitzer  red ribbon  sci-fi  Shell  stains  tar sands  toxic  UNHCR  volunteer  volunteer e-volunteer e-learning OLPC UN ActionAid MSF  war  waste  WED  whaling  Blogroll   Station 8  The Zocalo (Greek)     Greenpeace News  Your right to stand for forests is under attack — again Sponsoring climate change A tribute to Jon Castle   Save Darfur  No Winners in Sudan’s Election A Decade of Injustice: 10th Anniversary of Darfur War Crimes Referral Failing the People of Darfur   ActionAid News  An error has occurred; the feed is probably down. Try again later.   UNHCR News  An error has occurred; the feed is probably down. Try again later.   UN Aid Update  UN official calls on Israel to halt plans to relocate Palestinian Bedouin communities in West Bank Syria: Sustained fighting taking ‘enormous’ toll on civilians, UN aid chief tells Security Council UN deputy aid chief shines light on plight of 400,000 Rohingya still inside Myanmar  User Links   Register  Log in  Entries RSS  Comments RSS  WordPress.com      Advertisements    Report this ad       Feeds  Full  Comments      Blog at WordPress.com.  Top            Post to     Cancel                  Follow            Aid and Relief Awareness for the World  Customize  Follow  Sign up  Log in  Report this content  Manage subscriptions  Collapse this bar            #^$     Skip to main content             About  Challenges  Projects  Learning  Blog            Changemakers            English Español Português Français                  Search form   Search               Log in   FAQs                      Changemakers activates a global network of social entrepreneurs, innovators, business leaders, policy makers and activists to build an Everyone a Changemaker world.           Our Current Projects            C&A Foundation: Fabric of Change             Robert Wood Johnson Foundation: Children's Wellbeing             Creating Shared Value Prize             MasterCard Foundation: Future Forward             How we do it     Innovation Mapping  Customized analysis on the most relevant intelligence and insights from the world’s leading innovators needed to build the highest impact networks.      Challenges  An award- based competition aimed to mobilize key changemakers and changemaker institutions to develop and scale the most innovative solutions.     Bootcamps  A three day Changemaker- facilitated, peer-learning process, preceded by five months of meticulous candidate selection, curriculum development, preparatory content, logistics and storytelling for impact.     Courses  Ashoka- facilitated learning experiences for professional development and in social innovation and impact. The courses include intimate in-person workshops and a six week interactive online course, enrolling up to 80 select students.           $23,500,000 awarded  33,450 ideas shared  146 partners  197 countries                                                 © 2016-2017 Ashoka Changemakers.  Terms & Privacy Policy | Feedback           What We Do  What You Can Do Here  Our Team  Careers  FAQs  Partner With Us  Contact Us                #^$       CIVICUS Global Alliance        JOIN           Home Who We Are Members Staff Board How we work Accountability What We Do Strategic Priorities Knowledge & Analysis CIVICUS Monitor Resilient Roots Civil Society Watch Civic Space Initiative Enabling Environment DataShift Civic Pulse Civil Society Index Influencing CIVICUS at the UN Leave No One Behind Action 4 Sustainable Development Connecting Affinity Group of National Associations Youth Working Group Gender Working Group International Civil Society Week World Assembly SPEAK! (22-24 Sept) ' Get Involved Work With Us Become a Member Support Campaigns Civil Society Behind Bars Get Support Crisis Response Fund Media & Resources News Interviews Media Releases Reports & Publications Annual Reports SOCS Reports EENA Reports CSI Reports The Compendium LTA Guidelines Newsletters Toolkits CIVICUS Blog    Home Who We Are -Members -Staff -Board -How we work --Accountability What We Do -Strategic Priorities -Knowledge & Analysis --CIVICUS Monitor --Resilient Roots --Civil Society Watch --Civic Space Initiative --Enabling Environment --DataShift --Civic Pulse --Civil Society Index -Influencing --CIVICUS at the UN --Leave No One Behind --Action 4 Sustainable Development -Connecting --Affinity Group of National Associations --Youth Working Group --Gender Working Group --International Civil Society Week --World Assembly --SPEAK! (22-24 Sept) -' Get Involved -Work With Us -Become a Member -Support Campaigns --Civil Society Behind Bars -Get Support --Crisis Response Fund Media & Resources -News --Interviews -Media Releases -Reports & Publications --Annual Reports --SOCS Reports --EENA Reports --CSI Reports --The Compendium --LTA Guidelines -Newsletters -Toolkits -CIVICUS Blog Search                   FEATURED INITIATIVES                                 LATEST NEWS                   European States and US must take measures to protect Egyptian human rights defenders, both home…                April 19, 2018   European States and US must take measures to protect Egyptian human rights defenders, both home…     in  Media Releases    The undersigned civil society organisations express their outrage at the latest death threats targeting the Director of Cairo Institute for Human Rights Studies (CIHRS),…                   Somaliland poet’s three-year prison sentence a shameful attack on free expression                April 18, 2018   Somaliland poet’s three-year prison sentence a shameful attack on free expression     in  Media Releases    The three-year conviction of Somaliland poet and peace activist Nacima Abwaan Qorane this week highlights the increasingly repressive environment in Somaliland for peaceful expression,…                   Syria’s CSO sector and population buckle under humanitarian crisis                April 17, 2018   Syria’s CSO sector and population buckle under humanitarian crisis     in  Interviews    Following the chemical attack in Syria and the subsequent airstrikes on Syria by the United States, United Kingdom and France, CIVICUS interviews a representative…                   Vietnamese activists jailed after sham trial                April 06, 2018   Vietnamese activists jailed after sham trial     in  News    The sentencing of the six activists yesterday for peacefully expressing their opinions, illustrates the Vietnam authorities’ utter contempt for freedom of expression, said global…                   CIVICUS UN Universal Periodic Review submissions on civil society space                April 05, 2018   CIVICUS UN Universal Periodic Review submissions on civil society space     in  Geneva    CIVICUS and its partners have submitted joint and stand-alone UN Universal Periodic Review (UPR) submissions on eight countries to the UN Human Rights Council…                   Filipino activists stand firm after government adds them to list of terrorists                April 04, 2018   Filipino activists stand firm after government adds them to list of terrorists     in  Interviews    The Philippines government recently listed activists and a UN Special Rapporteur as terrorists and has threatened to pull out of the International Criminal Court.…         Load more 
											( 193 )  No more items           OPINION PIECES                   The Commonwealth's 2.4 billion citizens — what are their rights?                 The Commonwealth's 2.4 billion citizens — what are their rights?   By Cathal Gilbert and Trinanjan Radhakrishnan There has been a lot of talk of shared values ahead of the Commonwealth Heads of Government Meeting (CHOGM), due to be held in London from 16th to 20th April.…                   Civil Society, Resolute Resistance and Renewed Purpose                 Civil Society, Resolute Resistance and Renewed Purpose   By Mandeep Tiwana Each year, CIVICUS publishes the State of Civil Society Report, which chronicles major global developments and key trends impacting civil society. The report draws from interviews with civil society leaders at the forefront…                   International NGOs should ensure women are at the centre of daily operations                 International NGOs should ensure women are at the centre of daily operations   By Mouna Ben Garga (CIVICUS) and Ngozi Izuora (Innovation for Change- Hub Afrique) Many states are known for their strategy to exploit women’s rights for political purposes. But, the international community practices are not that different either–not…                   The aid sector must enforce standards, rebuild trust to survive abuse scandals                 The aid sector must enforce standards, rebuild trust to survive abuse scandals   By Anabel Cruz, Chair of the Board of CIVICUS Critics are using the recent scandals to delegitimise aid and humanitarian efforts. We, in civil society, must all be prepared to have this debate - seriously and…                   Decisive leadership needed from SADC to address DRC crisis                 Decisive leadership needed from SADC to address DRC crisis   By David Kode The announcement of a date for general elections in a country roiled in political conflict and ruled by an unpopular leader should be regarded as a positive move. But not so in the…                   Russia’s presidential election: a decline in citizen rights                 Russia’s presidential election: a decline in citizen rights   By Natalia Taubina and Bobbie Jo Traut The re-election of Vladimir Putin has been preceded by a significant crackdown on freedom of assembly and rule of law. The CIVICUS Monitor, which tracks and rates civil society conditions…                                                   Tweets by @CIVICUSalliance             CONNECT WITH US             info@civicus.org        Newsletters        /CIVICUS        @CIVICUSAlliance              SOUTH AFRICA    Johannesburg Office CIVICUS 25  Owl Street, 6th Floor Johannesburg, 2092 Tel: +27 (0)11 833 5959 Fax: +27 (0)11 833 7997      SWITZERLAND    Geneva Office 11 Avenue de la Paix CH-1202 Geneva Tel: +41 (0)22 733 3435      UNITED STATES    Washington DC Office CIVICUS World Alliance 1775 Eye Street NW Suite 1150 Washington DC 20006, USA   New York Office 205 East 42nd Street, 15th Floor New York, New York, 10017      UNITED KINGDOM    London Office Unit 60 Eurolink Business Centre 49 Effra Road SW2 1BZ, London Tel: +44 (0)20 7733 9696              Copyright © 2016. CIVICUS World Alliance for Citizen Participation.        #^$           Information to change the world      Search    Find Topics, Titles, Names related to your query   Advanced              Home   Search   Search Connexions  Browse Subject Index  Title Index A-Z  Authors A-Z  Organization & Websites  Sources Experts/Contacts     Library   Subject Index  Title Index A-Z  Author Index A-Z  Chronological Index  Format Index  Spotlight: Most Popular  Dewey Index  Library of Congress Classes  Connexions Archive  Languages Index  Deutsch  Espanol  Francais     Calendar   Submit an event  Expired Events  RSS Calendar  Sources Calendar  Other Calendars  Seeds of Fire chronology     Directory   Organizations A-Z  Subject Index  SOURCES media contacts  Alternative media  Include your group     Gateways   Arts & Culture  Economy  Education  Environment  Health  Human Rights  Indigenous Peoples  International  Labour  Marxism  Organizing  Palestine/Israel  Peace  Publicity & Media Relations  Race/Ethnicity/Identity  Socialism  Women  Connexions Archive     Connexipedia   Title Index  Subject Index  Persons  Organization/Movements  Events  Quotations    Seeds of Fire   Sources   Sources  Getting Publicity  FAQ  Sign up now  Media directory  Government directory  Submit news release  Journalists' page  SOURCES Subject Index  Search SOURCES     About   Contact  About Connexions  Wiki article  Donate  Volunteer  Archive space  Connexions Newsletter    More   Connexipedia  Seeds of Fire  Sources  About  Contact                      Connexions: What it is, how to use it  Connexions is many things: above all, a library featuring information about social change with 1000s of articles, books, films, etc. You can find stuff quickly, but to take advantage of the wealth of information on the site, use the research tools: the Search tool, browseable Subject Index , Title , Author , Chronological and Format indexes, and the many links within documents and on the menus (top and side) to related topics and further resources. More details about using Connexions here ...      Other Voices : The Connexions Newsletter  Get Other Voices , Connexions’ free newsletter,  via email or online on Connexions.org .  Looking for answers, creating alternatives: This issue of Other Voices features people who are questioning and challenging the way the world works and trying to create better alternatives. Read on ...      Organizing: Who, Why, How  Change requires organizing. Power gives way only when it is challenged by a movement for change, and movements grow out of organizing. Organizing is qualitatively different from simple ‘activism’. Organizing means sustained long-term conscious effort to bring people together to work for common goals. Connexions features articles, books, and other resources related to organizing. Read on ...      Seeds of Fire: A People’s Chronology  What happened on this day in history? Seeds of Fire is people’s history, preserving memories of struggle, resistance, and persistence. Explore what happened on this day -- or on any day of the year. Find out about people, movements, strikes, rebellions, revolts, uprisings, and revolutions, as well as the crimes of the ruling classes. Start with what happened today ....      Connexions Calendar  A calendar of events for and by grassroots movements for social change. Find events across Canada, and some outside Canada, related to social justice, human rights, environmental issues, people’s history, and much more. Groups are invited to submit their events for free. Contact Connexions to get a username to enable you to post your events. Find the Calendar here ....      The Connexions Archive  The Connexions Archive & Library is a sister project to the Connexions website which keeps alive the rich history of grassroots movements for social justice. Connexions preserves ‘alternative’ histories that rarely appear in the mainstream record, and makes them available online to a wide public, as well as in physical form to researchers and scholars. Established in 1975, the Connexions Archive preserves and publishes materials spanning more than 50 years of grassroots activism. Find out more ....      Help us secure a future for the past  Connexions was founded in 1975 to connect activists and organizers with information, ideas, and each other. In our 5th decade, we’re still preserving and sharing 'information to change the world'. Connexions is looking for a long-term home for our archive and our team. We’d like find a partner able to provide affordable space for a dynamic project. Find out more or contact us if you have ideas, leads, or space.       Connexions Alternative Media List  Connexions presents a selective list of alternative media: publications, websites, and broadcasters that offer critical alternatives to the mainstream corporate and state-owned media. We hope that it helps you to find websites and media that you’ll find useful in finding out and understanding what’s happening in the world. Explore it here ...      Connexions Quotations  Words of wisdom and throught-provoking insights: a selection of quotations about social change, resistance, politics, and a wide range of other topics. Quotations are arranged in alphabetical order by the first letter of the first word. Explore them here ...      Connexions Gateways  The Connexions website has tens of thousands of pages and images related to many different issues and topics. To help you navigate the site and find what you are looking for (or perhaps what you didn’t even know you were looking for) Connexions offers a variety of overview pages designed to provide introductions and pathways to exploring different topics and issues. Read on ...      Connexipedia  Connexipedia is a social justice encyclopedia with more than 1,000 articles on activism, radicalism, resistance, solidarity, social justice, events, movements, organizations, and people. Browse Connexipedia using the A-Z Index or the Persons , Organizations or Events indexes.      People’s History, Memory & Archives  The struggle to create a different future is also a battle over history and the meaning of history. Mainstream media and institutions of power try to consign inconvenient histories, struggles, and alternative visions to what George Orwell called “the memory hole.” People’s history projects such as grassroots archives – including Connexions – preserve and share stories of resistance, hidden histories, and alternative visions. This page is a gateway to resources on people’s history and grassroots archives. Find out more ...      What is Socialism?  Socialism is one of the most searched terms on the Internet – and on Connexions.org. What is socialism? Why are so many people talking about it? What are the different varieties of socialism? Does socialism offer realistic solutions to the world's problems? Connexions has a gateway to resources about socialism, socialist history, and socialist ideas. You’ll find articles, books, quotes, and a wealth of links to different ideas about socialism, its past, and its future. Investigate socialism here ....      What is Marxism?  Marxism is a way of critically studying and trying to change the world, a world which is itself constantly changing. Connexions features a variety of interpretations of Marxism, with the emphasis on perspectives that see Marxism as a theory and practice of revolution, seeking to liberate society from capitalism and oppression, and create a free, just, and communal society inspired by the principle “From each according to their ability, to each according to their needs.” Investigate Marxism here ....      Connect with Connexions     Newsletter   Calendar   Twitter   Facebook   Newsfeed   Contribute       Capitalism is failing the planet  If we continue with capitalist business as usual, there will be disastrous consequences for humanity. Capitalism is in unavoidable conflict with... Keywords: Climate Change - Global Climate Change      Let’s Get to Work  Building a worker-centered campaign transforms not only the union members involved but also the union they belong to. The task is not just to salvage labour’s existing institutions but to transform them and build new ones..... Keywords: Labour Organizing - Workplace Organizing      Happy Activism  How do we make our organizations attractive to large numbers of people? And how do we keep these folks engaged for the years, even decades that it will take to create a sustainable society? Here are some suggestions about how to make our movements strong and feed our spirits as we organize.... Keywords: Organizing - Movement Building      Rise of fascism again the issue  Fascism is preserved as history, as flickering footage of goose-stepping blackshirts, their criminality terrible and clear. Yet in the same liberal... Keywords: Fascism - Neo-fascism      Class is more intersectional than intersectionality  An approach that leans toward greater emphasis on a class struggle focus is actually more intersectional than a focus which gives more attention to demographic-specific issues than to class   ... Keywords: Class - Race & Class      Global water crisis causing hunger, war and terrorism  The world is already experiencing water scarcity driven by over-use, poor land management and climate change. If we fail to respond to the warnings... Keywords: Water Resources - Water Stewardship      Call Centre Unions Build International Connections  Workers are realizing they have to organize globally to combat companies who move production from one low-wage location to an even lower-wage location, in an endless effort to reduce workers’ wages and working conditions everywhere... Keywords: Labour Organizing - Unions      Liberal climate agenda doomed to failure  Liberal environmentalism represents a dangerous delusion, writes Scott Parkin – that ‘playing nice’ with Earth-destroying corporations and politicians... Keywords: Climate Change - Climate Justice      A Fossil Fuel Exit Program  A complete transition away from fossil fuels is necessary within a few decades. The question is how to construct an exit strategy that will accomplish this. James Hansen has provided a starting point for a realistic climate-change exit strategy.... Keywords: Climate Change Policy - Fossil Fuels      War by Media & Triumph of Propaganda  The world is facing the prospect of major war, perhaps nuclear war -- with the United States clearly determined to isolate and provoke Russia and... Keywords: Journalism - Media Analysis & Criticism      Toward the Agro-Police State  The main problem with precision agriculture -- and the hype that surrounds it -- is the faulty assumptions that it rests on. The problems of... Keywords: Agricultural Business/Agribusiness - Agriculture      The problem with identity politics  Political strategies based on subjective experience will tend to reflect the broader prejudices or the political agendas of those people making the determinations, and to arbitrarily elevate certain experiences over others and reduce the complex reality of oppression to a mere stereotype.... Keywords: Identity Politics - Political Representation      Fast food rights: organizing the unorganized  Campaigns to organize unorganized workers are taking place in different situations and different countries. Sometime big unions are involved, sometimes the campaigns are local. They are a growing movement, and they are having an effect.... Keywords: Organizing - Labour Organizing      Anatomy of a Propaganda Blitz  We live in a time when state-corporate interests are cooperating to produce propaganda blitzes intended to raise public support for the demonisation and destruction of establishment enemies. MediaLens examines some of the key components of an effective propaganda campaign of this kind... Keywords: Media Propaganda - Propaganda          #^$     0  items in your cart    $0.00  total cart value    Your Cart  Continue Shopping                                                                                        Home    About    Our Services    Clients    Store              404 Page Not Found     The page you requested does not exist. Click here to continue shopping.                 TERMS AND CONDITIONS     Customer Service Issue?  We've got your back.    Join our Mailing List                 MerchCave | Powered by Shopify | Designed by WeTheme                      Home    About    Our Services    Clients    Store   Log in  Create Account  #^$      DoSomething.org  Show Menu      Explore Campaigns  Find ways to take action both online and off.      What Is DoSomething.org?  A global movement for good.               Log In         Let's Do This!  Choose a campaign and take action with 6 million young people.   Start by finding a campaign below     Cause  What are you passionate about?     Animals  Bullying + Violence  Disasters  Discrimination  Education  Environment  Health  Homelessness + Poverty  Sex + Relationships         Time  How long do you have?     1 hour or less  2-5 hours  5+ hours         Type  What would you like to do?     Donate Something  Face to Face  Host an Event  Improve a Space  Make Something  Share Something  Start Something  Take a Stand              Staff Pick   Rinse, Recycle, Repeat  Make a recycling bin to make it easier to recycle empty beauty products.         Staff Pick   Grab the Mic  Unleash your power to do something about gun violence.         Staff Pick   Give a Spit About Cancer  Fight blood cancer just by swabbing your cheek.          Register to Vote!  Be so loud you can't be ignored. Take 2 mins, register to vote.          Mirror Messages  Post notes on school mirrors to improve people’s self-esteem.          Shower Songs  Make a five-minute playlist to help friends take shorter showers.          Run a bone marrow drive  You can save a life!          Helping Hands for Puerto Rico  Lend a helping hand in exchange for a donation to Puerto Rico.         Staff Pick   #SaveTheMascots  Help us make every college campus tobacco-free.             Sponsors               dosomething on Facebook    @dosomething on Twitter    @dosomething on Instagram    @dosomething on Tumblr    dosomething on Snapchat    dosomething on We Heart It    dosomething1 on YouTube      Who We Are   What is DoSomething.org?  Our Team  Sexy Financials  XYZ Factor  Press  Blog     Our Friends   TMI Agency  Partners  Crisis Hotlines     Get Involved   Scholarships  Jobs  Internships  Donate  Help Center  Bootcamps       Terms of Service  Privacy Policy.             #^$­        Action Menu Home  Join  Give  Volunteer            Navigation   Earthville Network  Empower yourself • Transform your world         WELCOME TO EARTHVILLE!  It takes a global village to make a better world. Our challenges are great, but our potential is greater. Join us!        RESPONSIBLE GLOBAL CITIZENSHIP  Know the world, change the world, and it will change you.        SUSTAINABLE THRIVING  Live well by living green. Do well by doing good. Win-win solutions for human and planetary flourishing.        EXPERIENTIAL EDUCATION FOR COMPASSIONATE ACTION  Learn life-changing things by doing world-changing things. Empower yourself to transform your world.        COMPASSIONATE CREATIVITY: ALTRUISM & THE ARTS  Engaging the power of human creativity to improve ourselves and our world. Meet our altruistic artists and the great work they support.               Home  Main Menu About   Welcome! A Quick Tour of Earthville  Mission & Vision  Milestones & Results  The Back Story: How It All Began  Earthville’s Leadership  Principles & Practices  Legalities & Formalities  About the Earthville Website    Projects   What We Do: Our Projects & Programs  Earthville Education   Overview of Earthville Education  Dharmalaya Institute for Compassionate Living  Earthville Education Blog  Earthville Education: Long-Term Vision  Earthville Institute (Proposed US Campus)    Earthville Arts   Earthville Arts: Compassionate Creativity  Earthville Music: Nonprofit Record Label  Lotus & Lightning (Vietnam)  Naked Mind Documentary Film    Earthville Planet   Earthville Planet: Solutions for a Flourishing World  ASEC Environmental Coalition  Dharmalaya Institute (Himalayan Eco-campus)  Earthville Orchards: Carbon Offset & Green Jobs    Earthville Action!   Earthville Action! Adventures in Applied Compassion  Earthville Action Hero Blog  ASEC Environmental Action  GAIA: Global Alliance for Interfaith Action  Responsible Global Citizenship    The Earthville Umbrellavator   Umbrellavator Overview  Acupressure Bead Research Project (USA)  ASEC Environmental Coalition (USA)  NADA India: Acupuncture Detoxification (India)  Open Dharma: Exploring Wisdom Traditions (International)  Sulha Peace Project (Middle East & US)    Earthville Projects by Location  Horizons: Projects in Development    Events   All Programs & Events    Stories   Top Stories  Earthville Blogs   The Earthville Worldblog (start here)  The Founder’s Blog  Earthville Education Blog  Earthville Arts & Music Blog  Earthville Citizen Lifestyle Blog  Earthville’s Good News Review  Earthville Action Hero Blog    Earthville Project Updates  Videos from Planet Earthville  Photo Gallery  Story Archive  Press Room   Media Resources  Press Releases      Resources   Overview: Resources for Earthville Citizens  Responsible Global Citizenship   What is Responsible Global Citizenship?  How to Change the World in Four Easy Steps  Earthville Citizen Lifestyle Blog  Starting a Nonprofit Project: Tips & Resources    Sustainable Thriving   What Is Sustainable Thriving?  A Closer Look: Six Aspects of Sustainable Thriving  Win-Win Solutions for a Flourishing World    Links: Connections to Websites of Interest to Earthville Citizens  Translations: Explore Earthville in Other Languages  Press Room: Media Resources    Participate   Join Earthville  Give to Earthville  Calls to Action  Plant Trees  Shop to Benefit Earthville  Earthville Events  Work with Us   Overview: Volunteer, Internship & Service-Learning Opportunities  Music Internship with Earthville Music  Help with Translation  Partner with Us    Connect with Us   Social Networks  Subscribe to eNewsletter  Contact Earthville      My Account   Join Earthville  My Profile  Log In      Return to Content             Informed compassion in action for a sustainably thriving world.  Earthville is a global community of local initiatives to create a more compassionate and sustainably thriving world through service-learning, green social entrepreneurship, holistic personal development, and creativity.  Empower yourself. Transform your world.  Here in Earthville, we make a better world by educating ourselves as responsible global citizens , empowering ourselves as effective change agents, and connecting with one another other in creative collaborations for experiential learning, volunteer service, compassionate commerce, and altruistic arts.  → All about Earthville               JOIN  Earthville is more than just a nonprofit charity: It’s a vibrant community of caring earthlings like you. You’re already a citizen of the world, so let’s make it official! Take your place in Earthville and show your support by joining now.  SIGN ME UP!    GIVE  Give the life-changing gift of education, training, and sustainable development to thousands around the world by supporting Earthville. Demand is rising and costs are too. Every donation helps, so please give what you can.  DONATE NOW!    SERVE  It’s caring people like you who make great things possible by volunteering your time. There are many ways you can get involved and put your compassion into action — at home, abroad, or online. To learn more, hit the button.  GET INVOLVED!            Connections: An Integrated Approach to Personal & Global Transformation  The challenges we face are complex and interdependent, so they require holistic solutions. Earthville’s interdisciplinary approach considers the whole picture to engineer whole solutions for the whole person and the whole planet.   → Read more about Earthville’s vision of responsible global citizenship and sustainable thriving .         What We Do: Featured Projects      Tapping the Awesome Power of Music to Create a Compassionate & Sustainable World  Earthville Music is an artist-driven record label cutting positive grooves from across the planet, with proceeds supporting artists and charitable projects worldwide. Our artists are multi-talented global citizens who make great music while making a difference somewhere in the world. → More about Earthville Music     Sustainable Development & Personal Empowerment Through Contemplative Service-Learning  Dharmalaya Institute provides education and empowerment for compassionate living, with a practical focus on sustainable village development and contemplative service-learning. Dharmalaya offers volunteer opportunities, green building workshops, meditation retreats, and more. → More about Dharmalaya     Sponsor Tree Plantings in India to Shrink Your Carbon Footprint & Create Green Jobs  Earthville Orchards is a carbon offset and green jobs program enabling conscientious global citizens and responsible businesses to sponsor tree plantings in India. With a few clicks, you can reduce your net carbon footprint while providing eco-restorative employment for rural villagers. → More about Earthville Orchards     → See all of Earthville’s Projects          Visit Blog  Top Stories            August 28, 2015    /  Leave a comment     Earthville Sponsors Benefit for Post-quake Rebuilding in Nepal     On August 28 Earthville and friends are launching the Nepal Earthquake Relief project with a benefit concert to support reconstruction in Nepal.               April 18, 2014    /  Leave a comment     Putting Meditation into Action in the Himalayas     Last month, friends new and old from all corners of the globe (five continents!) came to Dharmalaya to participate in our fourth annual SanghaSeva retreats at Dharmalaya. As usual, we were feeling like family by the end, and mountains were moved — both outside and in.               October 30, 2013    /  Leave a comment     Doing What Works: Dr. Kay McClenney on Proven Successes in Education     Kay McClenney highlights new evidence on high-impact educational practices in community colleges, and says the secret to student success is not a secret.               October 20, 2013    /  1 Comment     New Season of Service-Learning Programs in the Himalayas     After an unprecedented four-and-a-half-month monsoon, the Dharmalaya Institute in the Indian Himalayas is reopening its brand-new (and still-to-be-varnished) doors to volunteers, students, and interns, with a series of volunteer, service-learning, and retreat programs spanning the next eight months.        1  2  …  5  Next →            Subscribe to our eNewsletter                Photos on flick r          Stay Connected                  Earthville on Twitter My Tweets      [shareaholic app="share_buttons" id="125052"]              JOIN EARTHVILLE    DONATE NOW    LEARN MORE    GET INVOLVED               Photos on flick r        Check Out Our Earthville Music Artists!       Featured Earthville Projects  ASEC Environmental Education & Action (USA)    Dharmalaya Institute for Compassionate Living (India)    Earthville Education (USA & International)    Earthville Music (USA & International)    Earthville Orchards Carbon Offset (India)    Lotus & Lightning (Vietnam)    Sulha Peace Project (Israel & Palestine)    The Earthville Umbrellavator (USA & International)    → See all Earthville Projects        Home  Join  Give  Volunteer  About  Projects  Events  Stories  Resources  Press  Participate  Connect    © 2000-2015 The Earthville Network except where otherwise indicated. Some rights reserved under Creative Commons license.                   #^$              Not Really Relevant    Find something you're not looking for      I wasn't looking for this                      Chrissy Merton - Alice - A Journey  Chrissy talks about her experience of a difficult pregnancy that ended with her child, Alice,
dying only a few hours after she was born. 
She has now written a book about her experiences, and the love and support she was given by
those around her, in particular her husband Nick, the charismatic and famous fetal surgent, Dr. Kypros Nicolaides,
and two very dedicated mid-wives, not mention family and friends.  The book is an exceptional and moving account of the heroism of ordinary people facing everyday adversity; 
a manual on how to be magnificent when your worst nightmare comes true.  Chrissy Merton - Alice - A Journey       watch the interview >>>                 more >>>    How to reduce levels of violence in society  Phil Shepherd talks about George Hosking and the Wave Trust  In a series of interview clips Phil Shepherd discusses the work of the Wave Trust,
a UK registered charity, which has been carrying out global research to identify the
root causes of violence in society, and has studied 400 programs from around the world
that are working to reduce the levels of violence in society.  Phil Shepherd talks about George Hosking and the Wave Trust               Kyoko Oba - Self-expression as a path to World Peace  In a series of interview clips Kyoko Oba, a native of Tokyo, discusses
how Japanese popular opinion has been effected by the 9/11 terrorist attacks,
and her vision of Japan as a global leader in creating a world at peace,
powered by the richness of full artistic and cultural self-expression.  Kyoko Oba - Self-expression as a path to World Peace      more >>>                 more >>>    Malcolm Clarke - Whale Museum - Pico Azores  A series of interview clips with Malcolm Clarke including showing 
		some of the contents of his Whale Museum on Pico in the Azores.  Malcolm Clarke - Whale Museum - Pico Azores             Enter your search terms   Submit search form                           A Kind Of Magic  A film about Random Huggers day, 1st May 2005  Mayella Reynolds  The 2nd Annual Random Huggers Day was on 1st May 2005. EU was there to see a kind of magic happening on the streets of London. 
It made me proud to be human.  Click here to watch the video about Random Huggers      more >>>                 more >>>    Pico Azores  NRR explores the island paradise on Pico in the Azores.  Click here to watch the video about Pico Azores               Heather Cairncross - Hello Life Musical  Grammy award winner, Heather Cairncross, who has sung worldwide from Carnegie Hall to La Scala, Milan, via the film soundtracks for 
Harry Potter and Lord of the Rings, talks about award winning hit musical "Hello Life" in which she is now 
appearing at the Brighton Fringe festival.  Click here to watch the video about Heather Cairncross      more >>>                         more >>>    Fear Of Paint - Carl goes Paintballing In Manchester - Film Preview  Preview of forthcoming film giving the experience of what its like to go "paint-balling" ... 
the exciting outdoor pursuit activity.  Click here to watch the video about Paint-balling             Enter your search terms   Submit search form                           Daleks of the North - Preview of Interview with Andy Shaw of Shawcraft Robotics  In an inconspicuous garden shed in a leafy northern suburb there is a lurking menace which has the capability 
to destroy life as we know it. EU comes out from behind the sofa to see if we can't maybe manage to save the 
universe in the last few minutes of the final reel.  Click here to watch the video about Daleks and Andy Shaw of Shawcraft Robotics      more >>>                 more >>>    Budapest City Guide  Andrew and Vip explore Budapest, Hungary, the views, the tourists, and the locals. 
Providing a real sense of what being in Budapest is like. At least if you spent time with Andrew and Vip, that is.  Click here to watch the video about Budapest City Guide             Enter your search terms   Submit search form                             Geodesic Dome construction on Pico Azores.  Shows the construction process of the simplest possible (geometrically speaking) geodesic dome using starplates and wood beams.  Click here to watch the video about Geodesic Dome construction on Pico      more >>>                 more >>>    Lynne Hazelden - a Future for Communication  Lynne Hazelden is making huge strides for the quality of life of film and television workers. 
And with a controversial document she has sent to polical leaders around the globe, she is attempting 
to bring about a transformation in global political leadership. EU investigates the woman behind the work.  Click here to watch the video about Lynne Hazelden and a Future for Communication               The 2nd Conference on Global Transformation  Snippets of interviews taken in San Francisco and at the 
2nd Conference on Global Transmation, San Francisco, October 2002  Click here to watch a video about The 2nd Conference on Global Transformation      more >>>                 more >>>    John Podmajersky, Chicago Property Developer, and artistic and architectural visionary.  Video Interview with John Podmajersky, Chicago Property Developer, 
and artistic and architectural visionary.  Video Interview with John Podmajersky, Chicago Property Developer, 
and artistic and architectural visionary.
Being interviewed at the 2nd Conference on Global Transformation, Oct 2002.             Enter your search terms   Submit search form                                  Polar Bear Videos  Polar Bear Videos  Polar Bear Videos      more >>>                 more >>>    The Emergency 24 Hour Mobile Poets.  Performance poetry from e24mp:  Performance poetry from e24mp             Enter your search terms   Submit search form                                more >>>    Pocket Bike Videos  Pocket Bike Videos  Pocket Bike Videos                       Azores Videos  Azores Videos  Azores Videos      more >>>                    #^$    Free Republic   Forum  Log In  Register       Search:   Keywords  Users  Titles  Yahoo            Settings · Breaking · FrontPage · Extended · Editorial · Activism · News    HOME/ABOUT  Prayer  SCOTUS  ProLife  BangList  Aliens  StatesRights  ConventionOfStates  WOT  HomosexualAgenda  GlobalWarming  Corruption  Taxes  Congress  Fraud  MediaBias  FakeNews  ClickBait  blog  BOOM!  twitter  rumor  GovtAbuse  Tyranny  Obama  ObamaCare  Elections  POLLS  Debates  TRUMP  TrumpWinsAgain  Scandals  TalkRadio  TeaParty  FreeperBookClub  HTMLSandbox  FReeperEd  FReepathon  CopyrightList  Copyright/DMCA Notice  Donate     Donors · Monthly Donors · Dollar-a-Day Donors · 300 Club Donors        Please keep those donations coming in, folks. Your donations are needed to keep FR on the air!    Donate Here    Or by mail to: Free Republic, LLC - PO Box 9771 - Fresno, CA 93794       Free Republic 1st Quarter Fundraising Target: $88,000  Receipts & Pledges to-date: $20,002      22%       Woo hoo!! And the first 22% is in!! Thank you all very much for your continuing support!2       Latest Articles   Articles  Activity  Comments      Brevity:  Headers | « Text »      Pagination:  Next Page       Today's Toons 4/19/18    4/19/2018, 10:30:57 AM · by pookie18 · 1 replies  The Right Reasons ^ | 4/19/18 | pookie18   Click on link    WikiPolitics [VIDEO] Ex CIA / shadow Government (April 2018)    4/19/2018, 10:22:56 AM · by JohnThree3to16 · 1 replies  Youtube April 2018 ^ | WikiPolitics   https://youtu.be/ir-LtwZS_R8    South Korea's Moon says North seeking 'complete denuclearization'    4/19/2018, 9:26:56 AM · by Dana1960 · 7 replies  Reuters ^ | 4/19/18 | Rueters staff   SEOUL (Reuters) - North Korea has expressed its desire for “complete denuclearization” of the Korean peninsula and is not seeking conditions such as U.S. troops withdrawing from the South first, South Korean President Moon Jae-in said on Thursday. Moon said big-picture agreements about normalization of relations between the two Koreas and the United States should not be difficult to reach through planned summits between North and South, and between the North and the United States, in a bid to rein in the North’s nuclear and missile programs. “North Korea is expressing a will for a complete denuclearization,” Moon told reporters.    Iowa Legislature moves Toward Right to Arms Constitutional Amendment    4/19/2018, 9:12:15 AM · by marktwain · 2 replies  Ammoland ^ | 12 April, 2018 | Dean Weingarten   Only six states do not have some sort of right to keep and bear arms amendment or clause in their state Constitution. They are California, Iowa, Maryland, Minnesota, New Jersey, and  New York. California, Maryland, New Jersey and New York show the lack of a state constitutional protection with their highly restrictive firearms laws.Two outliers on that list are Iowa and Minnesota. State constitutional protections of the right to bear arms provide protection when the federal Constitution fails to do so. The U.S. Supreme Court has been reluctant to protect Second Amendment rights for a decade. Getting to the U.S....    AMERICA Prayer Vigil, April 19, 2018 [prayer]    4/19/2018, 7:40:40 AM · by Albion Wilde · 2 replies  FreeRepublic.com ^ | April 19, 2018 | FR intercessors   Join Freepers throughout the world to pray for PRESIDENT TRUMP and VICE-PRESIDENT PENCE and for AMERICA: All Levels of Government, Family, Military, Business, Education, Churches, Health Care Systems and the Media. This is the confidence we have in approaching God: that if we ask anything according to His will, He hears us. —1 John 5:14 Forum threads labeled [Prayer] are closed to debate of any kind. Please join us in prayer today for our economy, the national debt, and our finances.    Turkey again extends state of emergency    4/19/2018, 7:20:21 AM · by Eleutheria5 · 3 replies  Arutz Sheva ^ | 19/4/18 | Ben Ariel   The Turkish Parliament on Wednesday extended the ongoing state of emergency for another three months, the Hurriyet daily newspaper reported. This is the seventh time that the state of emergency has been extended. The last time was in January. President Recep Tayyip Erdogan announced the three-month state of emergency on July 20, 2016, five days after the failed coup that summer, saying it would enable authorities to take swift action against those responsible for the putsch. Wednesday’s extension means the upcoming early elections on June 24 will be held under the emergency rule despite widespread disapproval from opposition parties. The...    Syrian Kurds: We captured terrorist who planned 9/11 attacks    4/19/2018, 7:09:30 AM · by Eleutheria5 · 12 replies  Arutz Sheva ^ | 19/4/18 | Ben Ariel   A Syrian-born German national accused of helping to plan the September 11, 2001 attacks in the United States has been detained by Kurdish forces in Syria, a senior Kurdish commander told AFP on Wednesday. “Mohammed Haydar Zammar has been arrested by Kurdish security forces in northern Syria and is now being interrogated,” the top official said, but did not provide further details. Zammar, who is in his mid-fifties, has been accused of recruiting some of the September 11 hijackers. He was detained in Morocco in December 2001 in an operation involving CIA agents, and was handed over to the Syrian...    Cohen would sell Trump out to feds if he's charged, adviser warns    4/19/2018, 6:52:44 AM · by Coronal · 24 replies  New York Daily News ^ | April 18, 2018 | Stephen Rex Brown   President Trump can’t count on pal and personal lawyer Michael Cohen to follow the code of omerta, another Trump lawyer warned Wednesday. Cohen will readily give up Trump’s secrets to the feds in return for immunity from criminal charges, longtime Trump legal adviser Jay Goldberg says he told the President in a phone call Friday. “Michael will never stand up” for Trump if the government moves against him with breaking bank fraud and campaign finance laws, Goldberg said, the Wall Street Journal reported. On a loyalty scale of 1 to 100, Cohen rates a 1, Goldberg advised Trump.    Nobel Prize Winners    4/19/2018, 5:57:05 AM · by qaz123 · 7 replies  Me | 19Apr18 | Me   Not sure if I missed anything that may be related or written about he subject. If so, FR admin's feel free to delete post. obama was all about the show. Absolutely no substance. Won a Nobel Prize, just for waking up in the morning and subsequently wreaked havoc on anything and everything he touched. Whether by purpose or incompetence or a combination thereof. President Trump, while having no problems talking about certain things has also shown that he has people working behind the scenes, getting stuff done. And nary a peep about it. Not even the seeming, every leaks. President...    WATCH: Loomer Smacks Comey Down, Gets Tossed from Book Signing    4/19/2018, 5:47:20 AM · by Impala64ssa · 19 replies  Big League Politics ^ | 4/18/18 |  Peter D'Abrosca   The insufferable James Comey met our pal Laura Loomer today, and it was as explosive as one would expect. Comey is out and about pushing his White House fan-fiction novel called “A Higher Loyalty.” Today was the first day of the book tour, and his first stop was New York City, which he did after his appearance on ABC’s “The View.” During the question and answer session, Loomer grilled the disgraced former FBI Director, much to the chagrin of the Comey cult. “Hey Mr. Comey, how is it ethical to brief the President of the United States on the unverifiable...    Congress Sends Criminal Referral To Sessions, Wray and Prosecutor Huber…    4/19/2018, 5:11:54 AM · by bitt · 16 replies  CONSERVATIVE TREEHOUSE ^ | 4/18/2018 | SUNDANCE   Led by Representative Ron DeSantis congress has sent a criminal referral letter (full pdf below) to Attorney General Jeff Sessions, FBI Director Christopher Wray and Federal Prosecutor John Huber. The identified targets of the referral include: •former FBI Director James Comey; •former Asst. FBI Director Andrew McCabe; •former Attorney General Loretta Lynch; •former Secretary of State Hillary Clinton; •current FBI Agent Peter Strzok; and •current DOJ Attorney Lisa Page (former Special Counsel to Andrew McCabe). The identified reasoning for each of the referrals is outlined in the letter below. However, the risk to James Comey is not simply contained within...    Nova: decoding climate change    4/19/2018, 5:01:21 AM · by SteveH · 14 replies  Pbs   Anyone else watch nova this evening? It did seem to make a somewhat good case though at the same time seemed to duck confronting skeptic arguments directly or at least so it seemed to me. I am not following this at a level of detail that I feel competent to debate one way or another so I am curious for others' reactions.    WINTER IS COMING    4/19/2018, 4:46:14 AM · by Noumenon · 8 replies  The Burning Platform ^ | 4/18/2018 | The Burning Platform   “Summer will end soon enough, and childhood as well.” – George R.R. Martin, Game of Thrones “Reflect on what happens when a terrible winter blizzard strikes. You hear the weather warning but probably fail to act on it. The sky darkens. Then the storm hits with full fury, and the air is a howling whiteness. One by one, your links to the machine age break down. Electricity flickers out, cutting off the TV. Batteries fade, cutting off the radio. Phones go dead. Roads become impassible, and cars get stuck. Food supplies dwindle. Day to day vestiges of modern civilization –...    Catholic Caucus: Daily Mass Readings, 04-19-18    4/19/2018, 4:31:23 AM · by Salvation · 6 replies  USCCB.org/RNAB ^ | 04-19-18 | Revised New American Bible   April 19, 2018 Thursday of the Third Week of Easter Reading 1 Acts 8:26-40 The angel of the Lord spoke to Philip,“Get up and head south on the roadthat goes down from Jerusalem to Gaza, the desert route.” So he got up and set out. Now there was an Ethiopian eunuch,a court official of the Candace,that is, the queen of the Ethiopians,in charge of her entire treasury,who had come to Jerusalem to worship, and was returning home.Seated in his chariot, he was reading the prophet Isaiah.The Spirit said to Philip,“Go and join up with that chariot.” Philip ran up...    Sweden’s Violent Reality Is Undoing A Peaceful Self-Image    4/19/2018, 4:30:34 AM · by blam · 13 replies  Politico ^ | 4-18-2018   STOCKHOLM — Sweden may be known for its popular music, IKEA and a generous welfare state. It is also increasingly associated with a rising number of Islamic State recruits, bombings and hand grenade attacks. In a period of two weeks earlier this year, five explosions took place in the country. It’s not unusual these days — Swedes have grown accustomed to headlines of violent crime, witness intimidation and gangland executions. In a country long renowned for its safety, voters cite “law and order” as the most important issue ahead of the general election in September. The topic of crime is...    [Catholic Caucus] Thursday of the Third Week After Easter (Gueranger)    4/19/2018, 4:08:39 AM · by CMRosary  http://www.clutchingmyrosary.com/blog/?p=10083 ^ | 1868 | Dom Prosper Gueranger   White Â  â„£. In resurrectione tua Christe, alleluia. â„£. In thy resurrection, O Christ, alleluia. â„Ÿ. CÅ“li et terra lÃ¦tentur, alleluia. â„Ÿ. Let heaven and earth rejoice, alleluia. THE CHURCHâ€”founded and maintained by Christâ€”is it nothing more than a society of minds that know, and of hearts that love, the truths revealed to it by heaven? Have we adequately defined it, when we call it â€œa spiritual society?â€ No, most assuredly; for we are told that it was to spread, and actually has been spread, throughout the whole world. Now, how could such progress and conquest have taken place,...    Parkland survivors David Hogg and Lauren Hogg to publish book #NeverAgain    4/19/2018, 4:05:44 AM · by DeathBeforeDishonor1 · 66 replies  EW.com ^ | 3/16/18 | David Canfield   David Hogg and Lauren Hogg, students at Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School and survivors of February’s deadly mass shooting in Parkland, Florida have signed a deal with Random House for a book to be published in June, EW has confirmed. The siblings have been leaders in the gun control movement that took shape among students, in the aftermath of the Parkland shooting. Their book, #NeverAgain, is described as “a statement of generational purpose, and a moving portrait of the birth of a new movement.” The book will explore their efforts taking on some of the most powerful forces in Washington...    McCabe Swipes At Comey: He's Not Telling The Truth    4/19/2018, 3:59:39 AM · by Helicondelta · 26 replies  washingtonexaminer.com ^ | April 18, 2018   Andrew McCabe — who was fired as FBI deputy director last month — hit back at former FBI Director James Comey, saying he was not telling the truth in an interview earlier Wednesday. “Comey has relied on the accuracy and the soundness of the Office of the Inspector General's (OIG) conclusions in their report on Mr. McCabe. In fact, the report fails to adequately address the evidence (including sworn testimony) and documents that prove that Mr. McCabe advised Director Comey repeatedly that he was working with the Wall Street Journal on the stories in question prior to publication,” said Michael...    Jewish men attacked with belt by Arabic-speaking youth in central Berlin    4/19/2018, 3:54:01 AM · by Olog-hai · 15 replies  TheLocal.de ^ | 18 April 2018 12:26 CEST+02:00 | AFP/The Local   A video has emerged showing an Arab youth attacking two Jewish men in broad daylight on the streets of Berlin on Tuesday. The attack happened at around 8 pm on Tuesday evening in the Prenzlauer Berg district, police report. The two Jewish men, who were reportedly wearing kippas, were verbally attacked by a group of three youths, who used anti-Semitic epithets against them. One youth then emerged from the group of three young men and attacked a 21-year-old Israeli with his belt, while shouting “Jew” at him. The victims of the attack were able to record footage of it on...    Levin: Why Gorsuch teaming with the Left on immigration is disastrous to Trump's agenda    4/19/2018, 3:53:17 AM · by conservative98 · 57 replies  Conservative Review ^ | April 18, 2018 by |  Nate Madden   Supreme Court Justice Neil Gorsuch is dead wrong on deporting criminal aliens and that’s bad news for President Trump’s immigration agenda, explained LevinTV host Mark Levin on his national radio show Wednesday evening. Levin addressed the chorus of “conservative” and libertarian legal commentators who have lauded Gorsuch’s decision to join with the Supreme Court’s leftist wing on a recent immigration case. Gorsuch wrote in a concurring opinion that the law in question was too vague. Put simply, Gorsuch equated federal immigration law with criminal law and, as a result, determined that a criminal alien couldn’t be automatically deported. Conservative Review...       Pagination:  Next Page    Syndication:  RSS           Browse by Forum     Bloggers & Personal  Topics  Post    General/Chat  Topics  Post    GOP Club  Topics  Post    News/Activism  Topics  Post    Religion  Topics  Post    RLC Liberty Caucus  Topics  Post    Smoky Backroom  Topics  Post    VetsCoR  Topics  Post    Everything           Get Connected!  Join Free Republic Today!  Already a Member?  Log into your Free Republic account.    Breaking News (News/Activism)   Syrian Kurds: We captured terrorist who planned 9/11 attacks  Former Trump advisor's father's death labeled 'suspicious': multiple agencies investigate  If N K Talks Are Not Fruitful, I Will Leave, Trump Says  House approves reforms the day after IRS stumbles.....  9th Circuit appoints special prosecutor against Sheriff Joe Arpaio  Criminal Referral to Justice Department Regarding Comey, McCabe, Clinton, Strzok and Others  Dear FRiends, We need your continuing support to keep FR alive. [FReepathon XVIII]  ‘Nerves of steel’: She calmly landed, just as you’d expect of a former fighter pilot(trunc)  Trump "sketch...nonexistent man..."  Mitch McConnell Puts Kibosh on Bill Protecting Robert Mueller  More ...    Front Page News (News/Activism)   Syrian Kurds: We captured terrorist who planned 9/11 attacks  Journalist Disputes Syrian Chemical Attack in British Publication  GOP reps refer Comey, Clinton, McCabe for criminal investigation  You Won’t Believe What Tax Reform Will Cost Wealthy Californians In 2019  President Trump to speak at Naval Academy commencement  New letter to Wray, Sessions, and Huber referring individuals for violation(s)  Israeli intelligence reportedly says Trump's Syria strike failed, didn't take out much of anything  Rand Paul: Syrian Chemical Attack A False Flag  ‘I Don’t Get Confused,’ Nikki Haley Says, Rebuffing White House in Sanctions Dispute  Barbara Bush, former first lady, dead (RIP)  More ...         FreeRepublic , LLC, PO BOX 9771, FRESNO, CA 93794 FreeRepublic.com is powered by software copyright 2000-2008 John Robinson    #^$Grassfire  Top Menu #64003 (no title) “7 Key Battles Facing America” E-book 2017 – Reimagining What We Communicate and When ABOUT US Account Activate Activity Ads Archives Ben Carson Bernie Sanders Beta Testing Grassfire 3.0 Blog Bobby Jindal Bookmarks Carly Fiorina Cart Checkout Chris Christie Community Menu Contact Diary Discussions Donald Trump Frequently Asked Questions George Pataki Get in Touch With Us Grassfire Grassfire Beta Grassfire Community Forum Grassfire Election HQ Grassfire Home Grassfire Home Grassfire Members Only Briefing — “GRIT To Win” Grassfire Social Leaders Grassfire Staff Grassfire State Groups Grassfire Strategy Grassfire’s State Groups Groups Hillary Clinton Home Home I’m Demanding A Full Investigation Into The Deadly Benghazi Terror Attacks! Jeb Bush John Kasich Lindsey Graham Live GOP Debate Coverage Marco Rubio Martin O’Malley Member Blogs Members Membership List Mike Huckabee My Account MyGrassfire Candidate & Political Group HQ NancyTest Network Status News Wire Newsletter No Toys Official Grassfire Blog Official Grassfire Social Blog PETITION: ABOLISH THE IRS Protected Content Rand Paul Register Registration Rick Santorum Shop Shortcodes Ted Cruz Ted Cruz Terms of Service Thank You For Signing Our Petition And Standing Up For Our Nation’s Vets Thank You For Signing The “Reject The House-Senate Budget Deal” Petition Thank You For Signing The “Don’t Normalize Pedophilia” Petition Thank You For Signing Up To Receive Special Updates From Grassfire! Thank You For Taking Action To “Save The Pledge”! Thank you for taking action to save the “Ground Zero Cross” Thank You For Taking Grassfire’s Survey Thank You! Thank-You Page Thanks For Joining The Summer 2014 NO AMNESTY Team. Now Help Spead The Word… Thanks For Signing The “Oppose FEC Regulation” Petition Thanks For Signing The “STOP THE INVASION!” Petition Thanks For Signing The Petition Opposing Obama’s Executive Amnesty Thanks for taking a stand to STOP OBAMA’S INVASION! Username Change Request Users Volunteers Needed! WELCOME TO GRASSFIRE Welcome to Grassfire Social Welcome to Grassfire! Wisconsin Wisconsin Meet-Up, Job Fair and a New Wisconsin Website! Your Vote Has Been Recorded! Main Menu TAKE ACTION MONTHLY MEMBERS GRASSFIRE GEAR FACEBOOK  Sign in / Join      TAKE ACTION MONTHLY MEMBERS GRASSFIRE GEAR FACEBOOK     THE GRASSFIRE FEED 11 Apr Zuckerberg DOUBLES DOWN on thought police? Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Grassfire Special , Today's News By Tina Fox 56 0 As I listened to Mark Zuckerberg answer questions from Sen. John Cornyn yesterday, it became clear that Zuckerberg and Facebook are using these Conrgressional hearings to prepare the way to DOUBLE DOWN on censorship of conservative speech. When Cornyn asked Zuckerberg what he has learned from the data breach crisis, Zuckerberg responded: “…the big mistake that we’ve made looking back on ... Read More 9 Apr The REAL Facebook scandal Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Today's News By Tina Fox 54 0 This week, Facebook Founder Mark Zuckerberg will appear before two congressional committees to discuss revelations that Facebook has lost control of the data of millions (or even billions) of users. Facebook’s abuse of user privacy is an outrage that must be addressed. But unless we take action, the REAL Facebook scandal will not even be discussed by the House or ... Read More 26 Mar With Republicans like these… Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Today's News By Tina Fox 66 0 With Republicans like these… I’m not really sure what to say. It feels like Groundhog Day again. We’ve just been here before too many times. Sen. Rand Paul’s tweet from Wednesday summed it up well: “It’s a good thing we have Republican control of Congress or the Democrats might bust the budget caps, fund planned parenthood and Obamacare, and sneak ... Read More 5 Mar What I learned about Trump Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Grassfire Special , Products , Today's News By Tina Fox 109 0 Writing a book is an interesting journey. On one hand, you have the “end” in mind when you start. That concept is usually what drives one to write a book in the first place — some intellectual “destination” that you want to guide the reader to. In this way, book writing is quite deductive. The writer begins with a premise ... Read More 5 Mar Tell D.C.: “Drain the swamp!” Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Today's News By Tina Fox 97 0 I continue to wonder: Did we lose the election? Did millions of American patriots not go to the polls in November of 2016 with one clear mandate on their minds? Yes, we wanted a wall built. Yes, we wanted our nation secured. Yes, we wanted the “hate America” era to end. Yes, we wanted to repeal ObamaCare. Yes, we ... Read More 2 Mar Patriotic artist pushes back against anthem protests Action Alerts , featured , Grassfire , Grassfire Special , POTUS , Products , Today's News By Tina Fox 2450 0 With his new painting Respect The Flag, popular and patriotic artist Jon McNaughton pushes back against National Anthem protests with a spirit of patriotism and an appreciation for President Donald Trump. “I respect America,” McNaughton says. “I respect the flag, the anthem, and the President; because he doesn’t back down to those who do not.” The powerful image from the ... Read More Load More  FACEBOOK        ACTION ALERTS Zuckerberg DOUBLES DOWN on thought police? April 11, 2018 The REAL Facebook scandal April 9, 2018 With Republicans like these… March 26, 2018  TAKE ACTION MONTHLY MEMBERS GRASSFIRE GEAR FACEBOOK © Copyright Grassroots Action, Inc. All rights reserved.           FIGHT THE MEDIA GET GRASSFIRE UPDATES!                Login Welcome! Login in to your account     Lost your password?     Lost Password    Back to login  #^$                           Site Map                                About The League   Our History   Our Team   Partners   Jobs at IndyAct     News   Events   Projects & Campagins   Contact Us   Photo Gallery   Video Gallery                 تغيّر المناخ: سيناريو التشاؤم من قمة نيويورك إلى اتـفاقية باريس      كل شي بتكبو بيرجعلك على شاطئ نهر الكلب      كل شي بتكبّو بيرجعلك على شاطىء صور      معالجة مكب صيدا للنفايات... مشروع تدمير بيئي         IndyAct News       02 Jun   حازت مؤسستي أبعاد و بروموندو على الجائزة  ...  حازت مؤسستي "أبعاد – مركز الموارد للمساواة بين الجنسين" في  ...    19 May   الدالية ترقص بروّادها... سوف نبقى هنا  رقصت الدالية أمس على أنغام الطبول، وتزينت بالجِمال والخيول، في ظل حضور شعبي  ...    15 May   نحن تحاول ترميم حديقة صور العامة  تنظم جمعية “نحن” في مدينة صور حملة لإعادة تأهيل الحديقة العامة في  ...    14 May   قريباً... تدوير النفايات في جبل محسن-  ...  لا يمر يوم في لبنان من دون ان نسمع عن أزمة نفايات هنا و هناك. مكب صيدا, مطمر  ...    07 May   رماد الحرائق يكشف حجم المجزرة: محمية خندق  ...  معظم المساحات الحرجية في مناطق وادي شحرور وبطشاي وبعبدا التي طالتها النيران  ...    06 May   حريق هائل جنوب بعبدا اجتاح أحراجاً وهدّد  ...  انجلت عاصفة النار التي حاصرت أحراجاً وأودية ومرتفعات ومنازل في محور بطشية -  ...    23 Apr   حالات إختناق جراء حرق نفايات بطرابلس  تغطي سحب الدخان الأبيض منطقه القبة بطرابلس منذ ساعات الصباح الأولى بسبب حرق  ...    12 Apr   حملة #خفف_المي  لبنان، حيث يشهد حاليا تقلبات مناخية ادت الى مستوى متدني من المتساقطات  ...    18 Mar   جليدٌ على المرتفعات بعد "الشلوقي" والربيع  ...  ادت الفروق في درجات الحرارة بين الليل والنهار، بعد الهواء الشلوقي الذي عصف في  ...    17 Mar   Oil & Gas: Managing Expectation and  ...  Carole Nakhle, Energy economist and LCPS research fellow    Oil  ...    12 Mar   طلّ الضيف الأبيض ولو متأخرًا  بعد طول انتظار، وقبل أقلّ من أسبوعين على حلول فصل الربيع، يُطلّ الضيف الأبيض  ...    11 Mar   "من جد وجد ومن زرع حصد"  أهالينا الكرام   "من جد وجد ومن زرع حصد."   إن هذا المثل  ...    10 Mar   زرع 1500 شتلة في يوم المرأة العالمي  بمناسبة يوم المرأة العالمي وبرعاية بلدية كفردبيان  قام المكتب النسائي  ...    06 Mar   الابحاث الزراعية توقعت هطول أمطار غزيرة  ...  وجهت مصلحة الابحاث العلمية الزراعية رسائل نصية عبر الهواتف المحمولة، داعية  ...    03 Mar   طقس مغبر يسيطر على لبنان  شهدت مختلف المناطق اللبنانية طقسا مغبرا مع رياح ناشطة، تسبب بسوء الرؤية في بعض  ...    27 Feb   "ما ضاع حق وراءه مطالب"  أهالينا الكرام   "ما ضاع حق وراءه مطالب"   أود أن أبشركم  ...    24 Feb   'كافح التصحر.. حافظ على الموارد المائية'  في لبنان، حيث يشهد حاليا تقلبات مناخية ادت الى مستوى متدني من المتساقطات وشح  ...    24 Feb   Indy Act news on slider  Record Details    18 Feb   SESOBEL go GREEN     13 Feb   غاب الثلج فصُرف المدربون وعمّال المطاعم  يقف طوني عريضة أمام منتجعه الضخم في الأرز، يتطلع إلى الجبال شبه الخالية من  ...    24 Jan   القوى الأمنية تعتقل الناشط اجود العياش عند  ...  القوى الأمنية تعتقل الناشط اجود العياش عند مدخل مطمر الناعمة لجهة الاوتوستراد  ...    22 Jan   المطمر مقفل مجدداً ?، ماذا طُرح على  ...  مطمر الناعمة ـ عين درافيل مغلق مجدداً أمام شاحنات شركة سوكومي (سوكلين)، ما  ...    14 Jan   مطمر الناعمة لن يغلق قبل 2020  حصل ما كان متوقعاً. تمديد جديد لمطمر الناعمة _ عين درافيل سنة إضافية تنتهي  ...    30 Dec   مذكرة لتشجيع السياحة الخضراء  وقعت وزارة السياحة بالاشتراك مع الجامعة الأميركية في بيروت مذكرة تفاهم تهدف  ...    17 Dec   وزير البيئة عرض مع مورغان كيفية حماية مصادر  ...  التقى وزير البيئة في حكومة تصريف الاعمال ناظم الخوري في مكتبه في الوزارة  ...    11 Dec   نحو تأسيس تجمّعٍ لبلديات بيروت الكبرى  ...  في إطار الشراكة ما بين نقابة تجمّع البلديات للصرف الصحي لمنطقة باريس (SIAAP)،  ...    22 Mar   Lebanon’s Absence from CITES Convention  ...  Lebanon’s Absence from CITES Convention Threatens its Natural Resources  ...    11 Dec   CITES conference at Qatar might change the  ...  CITES conference at Qatar might change the maritime resources destiny    ...    10 Dec   Midway Through the Climate Talks and  ...  Midway Through the Climate Talks and Progress is Slow   Beirut – 10  ...    08 Jun   NGO’s write benchmark Copenhagen climate  ...  NGO’s write benchmark Copenhagen climate treaty    Press  ...    22 Jun   Save the Almat Forest  Save the Almat Forest   The forest is located in Almat, on the way to  ...    26 Mar   New Oil Spill in Chekka and Anfeh  New Oil Spill in Chekka and Anfeh   Beirut - March 26, 2008: During the  ...    08 Mar   Banat Akhir Zaman  Banat Akhir Zaman   Shou ya3ni banat akhir zaman?   You probably  ...    09 Dec   Historical Action Day against Climate  ...  Historical Action Day against Climate Change across the Arab World   Arab  ...    26 Nov   Seawater Level Caution Tapes Warn About  ...  Seawater Level Caution Tapes Warn About Climate Change   Climate change  ...    18 Oct   IndyACT Launches its  IndyACT Launches its    Some Arab countries, like Saudi Arabia, have  ...    18 Sep   IndyAct Wins Global Award for Fighting  ...  IndyAct Wins Global Award for Fighting Incineration in the Arab World    ...    02 Sep   IndyWomen  IndyWomen    INDYWOMEN   IndyWomen is a group of young women  ...    01 Sep   Environment: Arab World Climate Campaign  Environment: Arab World Climate Campaign   Arab Climate Campaign    ...          هكذا نعالج الاعتداء على الأملاك العامة البحرية     more     Take Action        Join IndyAct Communications Team We need your help to make a difference!        Give to the cause Help power the movement        Spread the Message             Campagins and Projects         Environmental  more         Social  more         Cultural  more         Activism  more                                                           Useful Links    News   About The League   Events   Projects & Campagins   Contact Us        Say Hello!   We would love to hear from you. Let’s have a talk     *     *     *              Contact Info        Rmayl, Nahr str. Jaara bldg. 4th Floor Telephone: +961 1 447 192 Fax: +961 1 448 649 P.O.Box: 14-5472, Beirut, Lebanon                        ©  By IDS              #^$  MENU  Home  Contact  About the IAC  Archive  JOIN US!         Founded in 1992 by Ramsey Clark      Home  Contact  About the IAC  Archive  JOIN US!                 Solidarity and Aid for the People of Puerto Rico and the Caribbean            Empowered women march on International Women’s Day            The International Action Center condemns Israeli massacre of protesters in Gaza            Unite to say: ‘No war on Korea!’            Demand emergency healthcare for Mumia (share widely)            IAC: 26 Years of Activism            Solidarity and Aid for the People of Puerto Rico and the Caribbean            Empowered women march on International Women’s Day     1 2 3 4 5 6   ACTION ALERT!      May Day call to action: End the U.S. war on immigrants     Black Lives Matter      End police murders = Abolish capitalism       Dr. Olivia Hooker, teacher, survivor of 1921 Tulsa racist attack    U.S.-NATO get out, stay out of Syria & Iraq!      From coast to coast       Syrian people defy U.S. missiles    PALESTINE      Gaza: The unbreakable will to resist       The International Action Center condemns Israeli massacre of protesters in Gaza       NYC: Friday, March 30 – Emergency rally: solidarity with Gaza #GreatMarchofReturn    UKRAINE      Resolution: International Protest Against the War in Donbass    Korea      After 150 years of U.S. aggression: Hands off Korea!       North Korean women thrive despite imperialist threats    Venezuela      U.S. hands off Venezuela       Washington wages economic war on Venezuela’s people    Latin America & The Caribbean      U.S. hands off Venezuela       Lula behind bars, workers in Brazil get ready to fight    POLITICAL PRISONERS      Herman Bell granted parole – but cops, politicians try to nix it       Support Herman Bell – Four Things to do Right Now!    Cuba      More doubt about ‘sonic attacks’ in Cuba    REVIEWS      Why young people picked up the guns: A review of ‘Turn the Guns Around: Mutinies, Soldier Revolts and Revolutions’       Venezuela, the shadow agenda / Venezuela, la oscura causa    ABOUT RAMSEY CLARK      Ramsey Clark’s unique contribution to human rights       TRUMPISM      Trump engineers right-wing takeover       Developing a program to defeat austerity       Class struggle, not tariffs, will save jobs    RESISTANCE ON THE RISE      May Day call to action: End the U.S. war on immigrants       Answer to #45’s border bluster: Resist       Organizers explain why they march against U.S. wars on April 14-15       Detroit conference advances fight against austerity    Labor Solidarity      Rail workers’ strike in France impacts big business       Labor in France confronts President Macron, tool of the oligarchs       Spectrum strike: Second year in workers’ war with banks       Oklahoma education workers defy and push forward    WOMEN      Empowered women march on International Women’s Day       Winnie Madikizela-Mandela ¡presente!       International Working Women’s Day: Celebrating liberation and revolution    LGBTQ      Boston cop’s transphobic rant at potential juror subverted justice for Sam Smith    THE WORLD      Labor in France confronts President Macron, tool of the oligarchs       Berlin Easter Peace March: ‘No!’ to war with Russia       Winnie Madikizela-Mandela ¡presente!    CLIMATE & ENVIRONMENT      Climate change and class struggle    HEALTH      Eyewitness Ames plant fire: Corporate poison and politics    CRYPTOCURRENCY      U.S. sanctions, cryptocurrency and blockchain    Fidel Castro, ¡presente!      Harlem, N.Y., meeting remembers Fidel: “The Legacy Continues”       Peoples Video Network Hands Off Korea! Foraging for the Light; an Elders’ Protest Song     Information, activism & resistance to U.S. militarism, war & corporate greed, linking with struggles against racism & oppression within the United States  ×  Please Donate  The IAC is a wholly volunteer organization and we totally rely on you. Click here to support our work   JOIN US!  SUBSCRIBE TO EMAIL ALERTS  Email address *    Confirm your email address *       Stay connected      Alerts & Report-backs      May Day call to action: End the U.S. war on immigrants       Organizers explain why they march against U.S. wars on April 14-15       Ending gun violence — a radical call       Support Herman Bell – Four Things to do Right Now!       NYC: PROTESTS FOR SUBWAY ELEVATORS RESULT IN FEDERAL ACTION       ICAP invites U.S. activists to XIII International May Day Brigade       Durham hosts People’s Tribunal       Demand emergency healthcare for Mumia (share widely)       Twitter Storm for Cuba/Join the 2018 Venceremos Brigade!       Delegation from Philadelphia makes #Big Push for Puerto Rico    Book recommendations    Social Issues Anti-war  Class struggle  Climate & Environment  GI’s & Veterans  Immigrants & Refugees  Indigenous  Labor solidarity  LGBTQ  People with disabilities  Prisoners  Racism & Oppression  Women  The World Africa  Asia  Europe  Latin America & The Caribbean  North Africa & West Asia  Other  TRANSLATE   Select Language Afrikaans Albanian Amharic Arabic Armenian Azerbaijani Basque Belarusian Bengali Bosnian Bulgarian Catalan Cebuano Chichewa Chinese (Simplified) Chinese (Traditional) Corsican Croatian Czech Danish Dutch Esperanto Estonian Filipino Finnish French Frisian Galician Georgian German Greek Gujarati Haitian Creole Hausa Hawaiian Hebrew Hindi Hmong Hungarian Icelandic Igbo Indonesian Irish Italian Japanese Javanese Kannada Kazakh Khmer Korean Kurdish (Kurmanji) Kyrgyz Lao Latin Latvian Lithuanian Luxembourgish Macedonian Malagasy Malay Malayalam Maltese Maori Marathi Mongolian Myanmar (Burmese) Nepali Norwegian Pashto Persian Polish Portuguese Punjabi Romanian Russian Samoan Scots Gaelic Serbian Sesotho Shona Sindhi Sinhala Slovak Slovenian Somali Spanish Sundanese Swahili Swedish Tajik Tamil Telugu Thai Turkish Ukrainian Urdu Uzbek Vietnamese Welsh Xhosa Yiddish Yoruba Zulu Powered by Translate        Local offices   Atlanta  Baltimore  Bay Area/Oakland  Boston  Buffalo  Detroit  Los Angeles  Maryland/DC/Northern Virginia  New York City  Philadelphia  Raleigh, NC  San Diego, CA  Seattle  Tucson, AZ      Links   Bail Out the People Movement  Depleted Uranium Ed. Proj.  FIST Youth  Leslie Feinberg  MECAWI  Millions for Mumia  Moratorium Now!  New Dombass  Poison DUst  PPA – Facebook  PPA – web  PVN – Facebook  PVN – web  PVN – YouTube  Stop War on Iran Campaign  United American Indians      Please Donate  The IAC is a wholly volunteer organization and we totally rely on you. Click here to support our work       Copyright © 2016 | International Action Center    Facebook Twitter Facebook Twitter             Original text Contribute a better translation ✓ Facebook Twitter Google+ Pinterest Email LinkedIn Reddit Tumblr WordPress Google Gmail WhatsApp StumbleUpon Amazon Wish List AOL Mail Balatarin BibSonomy Bitty Browser Blinklist Blogger BlogMarks Bookmarks.fr Box.net Buffer Care2 News CiteULike Copy Link Delicious Design Float Diary.Ru Diaspora Digg Diigo Douban Draugiem DZone Evernote Facebook Messenger Fark Flipboard Folkd Google Bookmarks Google Classroom Hacker News Hatena Houzz Instapaper Kakao Kik Kindle It Known Line LiveJournal Mail.Ru Mendeley Meneame Mixi MySpace Netvouz Odnoklassniki Oknotizie Outlook.com Papaly Pinboard Plurk Pocket Polyvore Print PrintFriendly Protopage Bookmarks Pusha Qzone Rediff MyPage Refind Renren Sina Weibo SiteJot Skype Slashdot SMS StockTwits Svejo Symbaloo Feeds Telegram Threema Trello Tuenti Twiddla TypePad Post Viadeo Viber VK Wanelo WeChat Wykop XING Yahoo Bookmarks Yahoo Mail Yahoo Messenger Yoolink Yummly AddToAny Facebook Twitter Google+ Pinterest Email LinkedIn Reddit Tumblr Google Gmail AOL Mail Outlook.com Yahoo Mail Email app More…#^$    Skip to content   Small Text  Normal Text  Large Text     Search       LastSuperpower     Sections    Home    go to our main forum    What's New?    Politics    World    History    Philosophy    Sci/Tech    Help!    Personal tools   You are not logged in   Log in    You are here:
    
    
        Home             Navigation      Home     HELP!     What's New?     World     Sci/tech     Politics     Philosophy     History     Links     Images     Documents     Files     News     Bright Future (the book)                   Welcome to Last Superpower   Document Actions               This site was established by leftwingers who support the war in Iraq. We called it "Last Superpower" because we believe that US imperialism is weaker than it has ever been before and is no longer the almighty superpower it makes itself out to be. This is a place for people who want to discuss what it really means to be progressive and left-wing in the 21st century - and where we can go from here.   IMPORTANT ANNOUNCEMENT!! We have replaced the Forum with a blog which we've named Strange Times. You can see it here The Forum still exists in archive form  (and is much easier to browse because each message opens far more quickly!) . However you cannot post to the archive. It is read-only. Click here to go to the archive. _________________________________  It's easy to join LastSuperpower and doing so will give you the opportunity to contribute your own  material to the site -   For more information click here. For help with using the site see our help files. "The pseudo-left opposes modernity, development, globalization, technology and progress. It embraces obscurantism, relativism, romanticism and even nature worship. At May Day rallies, the pseudo-left whines about how things aren't what they used to be." Click here for more info on our logo, "Lady Liberty".   On our MAIN FORUM  (now archived ... see above) you will find discussion on such issues as why we believe that knee-jerk opposition to US imperialism can't be the basis for being left-wing and progressive . The US under Bush is trying to ' drain the swamps ' of the Middle East - that is, undermine and overthrow the dicatators it has propped up for 60 years - and we should be supporting them, and demanding they do more and go faster. Egypt and Palestine are two important places to watch. what's wrong with the greenie world-outlook. and many other topics including Marxist philosophy , ( here as well ), Darwinism , the liberating role of developments in technology and science . If you are bored with pseudo-left ideology and would like to join in
discussions about building a genuine radical left, please come along and join in the discussion. And if you think we are wrong,  prove it by arguing with us - as sharply and
intelligently as possible. Click here for a description of our general stance Our archive: click on the yellow folders at the top left of this page to see our archived material.  Currently featured material:  Site sampler - a  selection of new and old material  (if you want more - read the archive and also our main forum ).        Marxism    Engels and Marx - Historical Method - The great basic thought that the world is not to be comprehended as a complex of readymade things, but as a complex of processes, in which the things apparently stable no less than their mind images in our heads, the concepts, go through an uninterrupted change of coming into being and passing away, in which, in spite of all seeming accidentally and of all temporary retrogression, a progressive development asserts itself in the end — this great fundamental thought has, especially since the time of Hegel, so thoroughly permeated ordinary consciousness that in this generality it is now scarcely ever contradicted. But to acknowledge this fundamental thought in words and to apply it in reality in detail to each domain of investigation are two different things.  ( Published : 2004-11-10 12:00 AM)   Engels on Hegel - all that is real is rational; and all that is rational is real. "Just as in France in the 18th century, so in Germany in the 19th, a philosophical revolution ushered in the political collapse. But how different the two looked! The French were in open combat against all official science, against the church and often also against the state; their writings were printed across the frontier, in Holland or England, while they themselves were often in jeopardy of imprisonment in the Bastille. On the other hand, the Germans were professors, state-appointed instructors of youth; their writings were recognized textbooks, and the termination system of the whole development — the Hegelian system — was even raised, as it were, to the rank of a royal Prussian philosophy of state! Was it possible that a revolution could hide behind these professors, behind their obscure, pedantic phrases, their ponderous, wearisome sentences? Were not precisely these people who were then regarded as the representatives of the revolution, the liberals, the bitterest opponents of this brain-confusing philosophy?"  ( Published : 2003-06-15 12:00 AM)   Mao Zedong - On Contradiction - This essay on philosophy was written by Mao Zedong after his essay "On Practice" and with the same object of overcoming the serious error of dogmatist thinking to be found in the Party at the time. Originally delivered as lectures at the Anti-Japanese Military and Political College in Yenan, it was revised by the author on its inclusion in his Selected Works.  ( Published : 2004-12-15 08:15 PM)   Stalin: Anarchism or Socialism - Classic exposition of the Marxist critique of anarchism.  ( Published : 2006-01-14 07:50 PM)   The Communist Manifesto - A spectre is haunting Europe — the spectre of communism. All the powers of old Europe have entered into a holy alliance to exorcise this spectre: Pope and Tsar, Metternich and Guizot, French Radicals and German police-spies. Where is the party in opposition that has not been decried as communistic by its opponents in power? Where is the opposition that has not hurled back the branding reproach of communism, against the more advanced opposition parties, as well as against its reactionary adversaries? Two things result from this fact: I. Communism is already acknowledged by all European powers to be itself a power. II. It is high time that Communists should openly, in the face of the whole world, publish their views, their aims, their tendencies, and meet this nursery tale of the Spectre of Communism with a manifesto of the party itself. To this end, Communists of various nationalities have assembled in London and sketched the following manifesto, to be published in the English, French, German, Italian, Flemish and Danish languages.  ( Published : 2006-08-06 07:39 AM)   The relation between materialism and idealism - ...the materialism of Marx and Engels was not mechanistic.  In rejecting idealism and asserting that consciousness is determined by life rather than vice versa, they were certainly not suggesting that correct ideas were automatically (mechanically)  generated inside our heads as some sort of knee-jerk response to ‘the conditions of life’. Although they sometimes talked of the human mind as a “mirror” of reality, it was always clear that human cognition must be seen  as  an active process of moving  from the concrete to the abstract, rather than just a passive reflection of reality.  Marx ‘s statement that “all science would be superfluous if the outward appearance and the essence of things directly coincided.” puts this in a nutshell  And Engels’ extensive writings on natural science and dialectics  leave us in no doubt  that there was nothing crudely mechanical in the way he viewed the relation between the ideal and the material. However while materialist dialectics in no way demeans the human capacity for thought and understanding, it  does reject the idealist premise that  human thought (rationality, consciousness) must be the starting point for philosophy.  ( Published : 2004-12-10 12:00 AM)   Things, Processes, Dialectics, Individuals - Engels describes how understanding processes is a higher form of knowledge than understanding things, and that the things “... go through an uninterrupted change of coming into being and passing away, in which, in spite of all seeming accidentally and of all temporary retrogression, a progressive development asserts itself in the end”. Much of the commentary about Iraq is from commentators who understand some things, more or less, but do not understand the whole process in the same way that we understand it. Hence there might even be agreement about most of the facts but the interpretation of the facts might vary depending on our understanding of historical process and how some things can turn into their opposites in certain conditions (dialectics).  ( Published : 2004-01-21 12:00 AM)          What does the real Left think?    a Couldn't we live perfectly well without money?  "I think that the problems with money are more or less self-solving. Marx explained this long ago, that the whole development of commodity production leads to the development of wage labour and capital, which leads to a deeper and deeper concentration of property in the hands of a few, and a larger and larger working class which has no stake in the present society and nothing to lose but their chains. That is the history of modern capitalist development, and it is the history of why Marx was so enthusiastic in his praise for the corrosive effect of money on the old communities."  ( Published : 2005-01-21 08:23 PM)   Writing "Fanshen" : a talk by William Hinton - On April 3, 1999, a one-day conference, “Understanding China’s Revolution: a Celebration of William Hinton’s Lifework” was held at Columbia University to celebrate his eightieth birthday. At the conclusion of the conference, organized by China Study Group and cosponsored by Monthly Review and Columbia’s East Asian Institute, Hinton gave an impromptu talk on the background to the writing of Fanshen: A Documentary of Revolution in A Chinese Village.  ( Published : 2005-07-14 09:33 AM)   Why the cultural revolution was defeated - a 1979 paper. Nobody can deny that the coup d'etat of October 6, 1976 has resulted in  a fundamental change in direction for China, and the dispute was between two fundamentally opposed political lines - whichever side you happen to agree with. Yet it was originally presented as merely the overthrow of four individuals who were described as Kuomintang agents etc., and their defeat was presented as a great victory for Mao Tsetung Thought and the Cultural Revolution. Quite clearly the Cultural Revolution and Mao Tsetung Thought has been defeated in China and this has had enormous repercussions for Marxist-Leninists, or "Maoists" around the world  ( Published : 2005-06-25 07:06 AM)   What's wrong with the Left? Peter Tatchell says "When human rights violations are perpetrated by people who happen to be non-white, much of the left runs a mile. They are fearful of being accused of racism and neo-colonialism. Does that help oppressed people? Of course not! Their oppressors rejoice. Mugabe must be thrilled that the international left has not campaigned to isolate him. He can point the finger and say, it is only the western colonialists who oppose them."  ( Published : 2005-12-27 07:38 PM)   Unemployment and Revolution - 1981 analysis of why unemployment occurs under capitalism. Many references to the particular conditions in Australia at the time - unemployment had reached its highest level since WW2 and there had been much debate in the media about the need for everyone to "tighten their belts" etc.  ( Published : 2006-08-06 09:19 PM)   The enemy is not America - Why is international public opinion not outraged at the treatment of women in Islamic fundamentalist societies? Why is it easier for millions of people around the world to see America as the great evil, rather than the countries in which governments ignore such horrific abuses of women?  ( Published : 2004-05-03 06:18 AM)   The Soviet Bloc was Capitalist - One of the critical tasks in resurrecting revolutionary politics is to refute the generally accepted belief that the former Soviet Union and 'eastern bloc' were socialist.  Both the 'left' and right espouse this view in order to discredit communism. It reveals a failure to understand what socialism is essentially about  ( Published : 2005-11-22 07:02 AM)   The Left and the Gulf War - During the [1990-91] Gulf War the pseudo left gave one of the most spectacular displays of its ability to get things wrong. They thought they were on a winner. Here was a chance to relive the Vietnam antiwar movement. But of course that fell flat when the Americans creamed the Iraqis in a matter of weeks, with the minimum of US body bags.  ( Published : 2005-11-22 06:53 AM)   The Bewildered Right - There are two possibilities - either Bush planned democratic revolution in the Middle East all along or he just made it up as he went along. We've been arguing all along that Bush and company had a very real need to deceive the right because Bush planned to do something that was genuine left in Iraq, overthrow fascism and support democracy  ( Published : 2003-12-01 12:00 AM)   Red and Green don't Mix - Red and green don't mix because they are polar opposites.  Reds want to create a better society on the basis of the conditions created by modern industrial capitalism while greens want to retreat from those conditions.  For reds, modern industrial society is creating the conditions for a future communist society, with bourgeois relations of production being the obstacle to its achievement.  ( Published : 2005-11-22 02:40 PM)   On the role of Mao Zedong - In 1995 a foreign reporter interviewed me about Mao. She sought me out as someone who had met the man in person and openly admired him over the years. She asked, "What about all the people he killed? What about all those famine deaths? And what about all the suffering and destruction of people in the Cultural Revolution?" With these questions she lined herself up with the current media line on Mao, the line of conventional wisdom, which is to present him as a monster—Mao, the monster. The Mao-the-monster thesis depends on two major charges. The first makes him responsible for all the euphoria and excesses of the Great Leap Forward and the organization of people’s communes, which, so the charges go, led to a collapse of production and finally to famine in China. (Isn’t it indeed strange that this famine was not discovered at the time but only extrapolated backward from censuses taken 20 years later, then spinning the figures to put the worst interpretation on very dubious records.) I do not mean to say that there were no mistakes in policy, no crop failures, and no starvation at all, but the hardships of those years are advertised as the greatest famine in human history, a conclusion that I do not accept. The second charge blames Mao for the extremes of violence and all the personal tragedies that occurred during the Cultural Revolution. Must Mao take the blame for all these phenomena?  ( Published : 2005-07-14 09:33 AM)   May Day - it's the festival of the distressed - For more than two decades, the genuine Left has been swamped by a pseudo-Left whose hostility to capitalism is reactionary rather than progressive. The pseudo-Left opposes modernity, development, globalisation, technology and progress. It embraces obscurantism, relativism, romanticism and even nature worship. At May Day rallies, the pseudo-Left whines about how things aren't what they used to be. The real Left has been marginalised, debating neither the neo-cons nor the pseudo-Left, simply because there has been no audience for that debate. Incoherent nonsense from complete imbeciles is published as "Left" comment in newspapers just so right-wing commentators can pretend they have something intelligent to say. In fact "Left" is used as a euphemism for "pessimistic", "unimaginative" and just plain "dull".  ( Published : 2003-05-01 12:00 AM)   Kafa! Zero tolerance for racist thugs! "Most of us are here because we are INTOLERANT of violent thugs on either side and want to do something to stop them. Racists on both sides want surfies and lebs to fight each other. That's no way to enjoy the beach" - Proposed leaflet for distribution at Melbourne anti-racism rally on Sunday December 18.  ( Published : 2005-12-17 05:36 PM)   Hegel and the Pseudo-Left - Three postings discussing Hegel's 1886 statement "All that is real is rational; and all that is rational is real", in relation to current pseudo-left ideology.  ( Published : 2005-06-15 12:00 AM)   Gerecht (US Right-winger): anti-American democracy is fine - "The fall of Saddam Hussein has already accelerated convulsive democratic debates in Arab lands and in their more combative and open expatriate media. The region's dictators and kings may have a difficult time stuffing this discontent and dissent back into the tried-and-true shibboleths—principally anti-Zionism and anti-Americanism—that have consumed the intellectual energy of so many, and offered the autocrats a safety valve for popular dissatisfaction with the regimes in place. Arab left-wing intellectuals seem today less domesticated than they were just a few years back, when they eagerly turned most of their venom toward Israel and Ariel Sharon. Muslim fundamentalists, especially in Egypt, still the lodestone among Arab nations, seem much less likely to play along, and are increasingly backing the popular push for more open political systems."  ( Published : 2006-03-03 10:24 PM)   Draining the Swamps: Correspondence with Chomsky. In September 2002, Chomsky wrote an article entitled Drain The Swamps  And There Will Be No More Mosquitoes. Subsequently the article  Mayday - It's the Festival of the Distressed was published, which argued that the US is indeed following a policy of draining the swamps.  This view waspresented to Chomsky who refused to give it any serious consderation.  ( Published : 2004-12-09 06:56 AM)   Discussion of Postrel's book: "The Future and its Enemies" - Postrel divides the world into dynamists and stasists - dynamists support evolution and the processes of variation, feedback and adaptation - stasists supports stability. "Do we search for stasis - a regulated engineered world? Or do we embrace dynamism - a world of constant creation, discovery and competition?"  ( Published : 2004-12-12 06:00 AM)   Barry York: Not in your name, indeed - It is too late for the so-called Left in Australia to stand anywhere but condemned for its failure to support the successful war to liberate Iraq. It stood on the side of reaction, and the history books must place its leaders alongside the British pacifists of the '30s who, as George Orwell pointed out, gave comfort and objective support to Hitler. The pseudo-Left proved not just that it can be wrong but that in the name of anti-Americanism it can support fascism.  ( Published : 2005-10-15 12:00 AM)   Arab liberals debate - Lebanese Pierre Akel hosts the popular Web site Middle East Transparent, which receives 50,000-60,000 hits a day. While the Paris-based site is trilingual (Arabic, English, French), its particular value is that it has become a forum for Arab liberals who would otherwise have no outlet for their writings.  ( Published : 2006-02-09 05:06 PM)   Analysing the pseudo-left - The fact that any sort of genuine left (however defined) is currently absent is what makes it possible for people with fundamentally reactionary politics to be mistaken for "leftists" merely by using a thin veneer of "left language". But that absence is not the cause of the reactionary politics nor is the pseudo-left the reason for the absence of a genuine left. I'm delighted to see Harry again using the term "pseudo-left" as widespread adoption of that term will help clarify a lot of things. But it simply doesn't make sense to hope that the likes of Monbiot finally realizing that they are not opposed to capitalism could be a step towards the emergence of a left that isn't pseudo.  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:31 PM)   1993 review of "Imperialism, pioneer of Capitalism" - Bill Warren's book, Imperialism, Pioneer of Capitalism, performs a useful service by refuting much of the mythology that the left has embraced in the name of 'anti- imperialism'.  ( Published : 2005-11-22 06:06 AM)   Fascism and the Left  - "A major theme in left wing propaganda is opposition to fascism. Quite often relatively moderate opponents of the left are described as "fascists". Yet scratch a "Communist" and one quite often finds a fascist underneath...The degeneration of Communist Parties in power is a separate problem calling for a separate analysis. But what about the degeneration of parties holding no power?"  ( Published : 2006-01-04 05:20 AM)          Some of our forum topics    Aggression, fascism, strategy and logic - discussion from previous LS site. Why, and when, should we support the US overthrow of fascist regimes?  ( Published : 2003-05-11 12:00 AM)   All that is solid melts into air! "Modern bourgeois society, a society that has conjured up such gigantic means of production and exchange, is like the sorcerer who is no longer able to control the powers of the underworld that he has called up by his spells." - The Communist Manifesto  ( Published : 2006-08-05 02:16 AM)   Building Democracy in Iraq - There is a lot of good, interesting analysis going on here. Site members are really tring to stretch themselves far beyond 'gotcha!' debating points, to work out what to do now in Iraq.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 05:47 AM)   Chomsky: drowning not waving...The US ruling-elite forgot how to install puppets, is the stunning conclusion we are asked to draw from an interview by znet with Noam Chomsky given on 27/12/05. patrickm discusses the interview - their differences are that Chomsky believes the USA just wanted to install puppets in Iraq, while patrickm thinks that they are real 'bourgeios democrats'. That is to say, the politicians of Iraq are as free as the politicians of the USA, Australia, or any other western liberal-capitalist society.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 06:25 AM)   Current Events (or events that were current at the time of writing) - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:35 AM)   Debate with Clive Bradley - This is a long debate about the Iraq war between Clive Bradley, from the British Trotskyist group "Alliance for Worker's Liberty", and members of Last Superpower  ( Published : 2003-12-03 12:00 AM)   Dialectics - it's important to study dialectics itself (Mao, Hegel etc.) because this creates an awareness or sensitivity to possibilities of things turning into their opposite that we otherwise might not even notice - it has the potential to make our thinking more fluid and flexible.  ( Published : 2006-08-04 10:50 PM)   Draining  the Swamps - in 2002 Noam Chomsky said we need to 'drain the swamps' of the Middle East (that is, overthrow the fascist tyrants of the MidEast) to make sure we breed no more terrorist "mosquitoes". We agree, and we say that is just what Bush is doing.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 02:32 AM)   Forward with Revolution - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:52 AM)   Grand Strategy - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:40 AM)   Hamas and Egypt - Far more significant than Hamas' temporary ascendancy is the explosive effect for the region as a whole. If Hamas can be elected in occupied Palestine and Fateh can become a loyal opposition aiming to win back power in later elections, why can't the Muslim Brotherhood be elected in Egypt and the most important Arab state become a democracy too? Every regime in the region will be shaken to its foundations. And not just shaken.  ( Published : 2006-08-04 11:18 PM)   History - A collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:30 AM)   Iraq, the Mideast, and South Asia - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 06:22 AM)   Israel's POWs - What's Israel's game plan  in its war with Hezbollah? Talking and acting  tough but actually preparing Israeli opinion for withdrawal from the West Bank?  ( Published : 2006-08-04 10:58 PM)   Last Superpower Site Direction - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:48 AM)   Liberating Technology - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:44 AM)   Materialism and Atheism - a collection of links to our best posts on the topic  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:56 AM)   Middle East settlement - The Orwellian process in which "Oceania is at war with Eurasia, Oceania has always been at war with Eurasia" seems almost complete. What looks like war mongering against Iran and exceptionally bellicose propaganda for brave little Israel with ludicrous claims that it is defending itself from extinction at the hands of murderous terrorists and denying that the root cause is the Israeli occupation and disposession of the Palestinians ends up making withdrawal from the West Bank and establishment of a Palestinian state look like a minor tactial adjustment to help isolate Iran.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 01:47 AM)   Multiculturalism - At one time to support multiculturalism was to be politically correct. What do "multiculturalism", "liberalism" and"cultural relativism" mean exactly and where do they fit in an analysis of progress?  ( Published : 2006-08-05 01:41 AM)   Policy on Iran - This thread starts with a link to a Christopher Hitchens article, which asks what the Left should do about the priestly regime in Iraq. After a brief reply with some links, a very strange cat indeed is thrown amongst the pigeons. The reply says that "most of the material appearing on current US and Iranian strategic intentions is disinformation". Suspicion is that Shi'ite Iran and the USA are in an unspoken alliance, since Sunni militants like Bin Laden and the Wahabi fundamentalists in Saudi Arabia are their common enemy.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 05:55 AM)   Super Imperialism - This thread starts off by asking, "What is the ruling class like at the moment"? A ruling class dominated by multi-national corporations is different to one dominated by 'national' or 'local' corporations. There are bitter struggles going on right now inside the ruling class about which sort of business should have the upper hand. There have been all sorts of changes in the world since the fall of the Soviet Union. Once again, the ruling class fights inside itself to decide, for instance, if they should just prop up friendly dictators like Sadaam or the House of Saud, or if they should try and overthrow them. We need to be able to think clearly about this so that we can start asking 'when does revolution become possible?'.  ( Published : 2006-08-05 05:40 AM)   Third Anniversary of Iraq War - Byork (No, not the megafamous one) starts the thread by referring to a 'defeatist' article in 'The Age' (Melbourne's 'liberal' broadsheet, roughly similar in outlook to the Guardian in the UK, or National Public Radio in the USA), on March 14th, 2006. Was Bush's infamous 'mission accomplished' mistake avoidable? Was it even a mistake?  ( Published : 2006-08-05 06:02 AM)   We need Marx because he understood some things and said some things better than anyone else has since. It's important to read the original because people who call themselves marxists have always been in violent disagreement with what it means. If you don't read the original then you have no chance of working it out for yourself.  ( Published : 2006-08-06 08:09 AM)   What is Progress, and what is the connection between technology and progress? Is there a genetic lottery,and if so how should we respond to it? How do these questions relate to being left-wing or right-wing?  ( Published : 2006-08-04 11:04 PM)   What is the pseudo-left? The pseudo-Left opposes modernity, development, globalisation, technology and progress. It embraces obscurantism, relativism, romanticism and even nature worship. At May Day rallies, the pseudo-Left whines about how things aren't what they used to be.  ( Published : 2006-08-04 10:32 PM)       Created by  keza   Last modified 2008-06-19 06:25 AM               Log in       Name      Password            Forgot your password?         News     What a difference a month makes . . .  2008-04-25     Do not fight Iraqi forces, al-Sadr tells followers  2008-04-25     The men in black vanish and Basra comes to life  2008-04-25     Iraqi forces see victory in Basra  2008-04-25     Sunnis breaking from Al Qaeda  2007-07-08     The Road Home (disgusting  editorial from the NY Times)  2007-07-08     140 Iraqis murdered in Ermeli  2007-07-08     Letter from Kurdistan: Holiday in Iraq  2007-03-20     David Hicks should give his parole, and be released - patrickm at Larvatus Prodeo  2007-02-20     Book Review: "From outside the box, a positive vision for the planet"  2007-02-02     Who controls the Iraqi Shia?  2007-01-19     Progressives need to unite against criminals who bomb universities in Iraq  2007-01-18     Pamela Bone: Women's right to equality  2006-12-03     Kininmonth on the Stern Report  2006-11-02     Maliki: I'm "not America's man in Iraq"  2006-11-01    More...                Plone and its visual design is Copyright © 2000- 2018 by Alexander Limi , Alan Runyan , Vidar Andersen .       This site conforms to the following standards:                              #^$   oregonpeaceworks.org is almost here!  Upload your website to get started.   Need help?  Admin Panel   DreamHost  #^$       DONATE        English    English Haitian Creole Spanish     Select Language Afrikaans Albanian Amharic Arabic Armenian Azerbaijani Basque Belarusian Bengali Bosnian Bulgarian Catalan Cebuano Chichewa Chinese (Simplified) Chinese (Traditional) Corsican Croatian Czech Danish Dutch Esperanto Estonian Filipino Finnish French Frisian Galician Georgian German Greek Gujarati Haitian Creole Hausa Hawaiian Hebrew Hindi Hmong Hungarian Icelandic Igbo Indonesian Irish Italian Japanese Javanese Kannada Kazakh Khmer Korean Kurdish (Kurmanji) Kyrgyz Lao Latin Latvian Lithuanian Luxembourgish Macedonian Malagasy Malay Malayalam Maltese Maori Marathi Mongolian Myanmar (Burmese) Nepali Norwegian Pashto Persian Polish Portuguese Punjabi Romanian Russian Samoan Scots Gaelic Serbian Sesotho Shona Sindhi Sinhala Slovak Slovenian Somali Spanish Sundanese Swahili Swedish Tajik Tamil Telugu Thai Turkish Ukrainian Urdu Uzbek Vietnamese Welsh Xhosa Yiddish Yoruba Zulu Select Language Afrikaans Albanian Amharic Arabic Armenian Azerbaijani Basque Belarusian Bengali Bosnian Bulgarian Catalan Cebuano Chichewa Chinese (Simplified) Chinese (Traditional) Corsican Croatian Czech Danish Dutch Esperanto Estonian Filipino Finnish French Frisian Galician Georgian German Greek Gujarati Haitian Creole Hausa Hawaiian Hebrew Hindi Hmong Hungarian Icelandic Igbo Indonesian Irish Italian Japanese Javanese Kannada Kazakh Khmer Korean Kurdish (Kurmanji) Kyrgyz Lao Latin Latvian Lithuanian Luxembourgish Macedonian Malagasy Malay Malayalam Maltese Maori Marathi Mongolian Myanmar (Burmese) Nepali Norwegian Pashto Persian Polish Portuguese Punjabi Romanian Russian Samoan Scots Gaelic Serbian Sesotho Shona Sindhi Sinhala Slovak Slovenian Somali Spanish Sundanese Swahili Swedish Tajik Tamil Telugu Thai Turkish Ukrainian Urdu Uzbek Vietnamese Welsh Xhosa Yiddish Yoruba Zulu Powered by Translate Powered by Translate              Home About Us About Us Remembering Bill Callahan Our Team Our Board Our Financials Programs Programs Quest for Peace Haiti Reborn Catholics Speak Out Criminal Justice Reform Qommunity Actions Blog Contact            MENU                    Educating Haitian youth about reforestation and sustainable farming             Providing homes for families to combat the housing crisis in Nicaragua             Thanks to everyone for a wonderful reunion celebration! More details to come...            Slide-1  Slide-3  IMG 1169a            We stand in solidarity and friendship A gathering of people who work and pray with laughter, to reach for the stars that seem too distant to be touched, or too dim to be worth the effort. We try to be friends with people in need, and to celebrate life with people who believe that the struggle to be like Jesus in building a world more justly loving is worth the gift of our lives.        What We Do        Quest for Peace   See our work with local organizations in Nicaragua, the Institute of John XXIII and FEDICAMP.         Haiti Reborn   See our work for reforestation and sustainable agriculture in northern Haiti.         Catholics Speak Out   The Quixote Center has been at the forefront of building a more inclusive church         Criminal Justice Reform   We are working to create a new kind of justice system              Latest Blog Post             Liberian Deferred Enforced Departure, Colonialism, and White Supremacy     Given the pace of anti-immigration news over the past several months, the termination of another immigration initiative should hardly come as a surprise, but the announced wind-down over the next year of the Deferred Enforced Departure (DED) for Liberians hardly made a blip on the radar of national news. This change is further evidence of the current administration’s wanton disregard for the lives of those who come to the United States to carry on their lives with dignity and hope.  Rewire.News supplies answers to many questions in an excellent piece from last week titled: “ What is Deferred Enforced Departure? It’s Complicated .”  Here are a few answers to a couple of basic questions from that piece:  How do you receive DED status?  According to an official from USCIS, eligibility requirements for DED are up to the discretion of the president and any relevant requirements established by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS). Applicants for immigration benefits are subject to criminal and national security background checks, but DED differs from other benefits in that there is no formal application process.  “There is no form associated with DED. This means they do not apply for DED but are instead covered by DED,” a USCIS official said in an emailed statement to Rewire.News .  How many Liberian DED beneficiaries are there?  Because there is no application or registration for DED, the official number of Liberian DED recipients is unknown. According to USCIS, the maximum number of Liberians covered by DED would be approximately 3,600, the number of Liberians who held TPS when it was terminated in 2007. Roughly 840 Liberian DED recipients who applied for and currently have work authorization will be affected by Trump’s decision to end DED for Liberia.  The relatively small number of Liberian DED recipients means that the impact on the national level is minimal, but we must think about the context in order to understand why this case matters.  To begin with, Liberian history is directly linked to the U.S. institutions of slavery and colonialism dating to the pre-Civil War era. In the face of a growing population of freed black slaves in the abolitionist northern region of the United States, the American Colonization Society proposed to create a nation in Africa where freed slaves could live. This process of colonial settlement of a diverse population of freed slaves started in 1820 and resulted in conflict between a new ruling class of Americo-Liberians and the indigenous peoples of the region. The government was led by Americo-Liberians from the nation’s founding in 1847 until 1980. The other 95% of the population, descended from local ethnic groups rather than the descendants of settlers from the United States, was totally excluded from power.  A coup d’etat in 1980 marked a shift in political power. The resulting instability and struggle would lead to two civil wars and death of 250,000 people.  Although the country has been in a process of recovery for the past 15 years or so, an Ebola outbreak in 2014 created further pressure for people to leave. Economic restructuring has led Liberia to have one of the highest levels of foreign investment as a percentage of GDP in the world. The resulting growth of concessions to foreign extractive industries since 2006 has displaced tens of thousands of people. As a result of the wars and crises that have followed, many people have been traumatized and can hardly be blamed for seeking new beginnings elsewhere.  Since the political consequences of this U.S. colonial enterprise continue to affect Liberia even today, the United States should accept its responsibility to provide – if not reparations – at least a welcoming policy for any Liberian who seeks life in the United States.  Moreover, apart from the particular gravity of the Liberian case, there is another important pattern to observe in the immigration decisions made by this administration. All of the immigration program suspensions and wind-downs that have been announced in the past year – Central American Minors, TPS for many countries, DED for Liberia – share a common feature: they target immigrants who come from places other than Europe. #45, who has been married to two women from Eastern Europe, seems to be unconcerned about European migration to the United States and has even reportedly suggested that he would be happy with fewer people arriving from Haiti and Africa, and more from places like Norway. (DACA represents a minor deviation from this general practice, since 0.7% of Dreamers were born in Europe.)  Finally, if the President actually had any level of concern about a vulnerable population from a particular place, it would be within the power of the office to allow them to remain in the U.S. legally under DED. Any statement he makes to blame others for the brutal and inhumane immigration policies of his administration is simply empty rhetoric. And ending DED for Liberia serves as one more example of a pattern of abuse of some of the most resilient – yet vulnerable – among us. Our place is to stand alongside these neighbors and not to allow them to be forgotten when the next Tweet comes along.    Read more                Inspirational and Influential Women of the World: Myriam Merlet     Part IV of the Inspirational and Influential Women of the World Blog Series  Myriam Merlet  Myriam Merlet was considered one of Haiti’s most prominent leaders and catalysts of the women’s rights movement. Merlet was one of the 300,000 people who perished in the  7.3 magnitude earthquake that struck Haiti in 2010. As part of our series on inspirational and influential women, we take a look at her work as an advocate for gender equality and the rights of women facing sexual violence.  In the  70s , Merlet left Haiti and sought refuge in Canada, where she studied economics, women’s issues, feminist theory, and political sociology. Upon the completion of her studies, Merlet returned to Haiti in the mid 1980s,  stating , “While I was abroad I felt the need to find out who I was and where my soul was. I chose to be a Haitian woman. We’re a country in which three-fourths of the people can’t read and don’t eat properly. I’m an integral part of the situation…as a Haitian woman, I must make an effort so that all together we can extricate ourselves from them [the problems].” Upon returning to Haiti, Merlet used her education to lead grassroots advocacy to promote the rights of Haitian women and worked with others to change the culturally accepted norm of gender-based violence.  Merlet was involved in an array of organizations seeking to create and enforce gender equality. In Merlet’s early advocacy years, she founded  EnfoFanm , an organization that sought to raise global awareness about the challenges Haitian women face, namely the history and continued use of sexual assault by government soldiers, police, and criminal gangs as means of controlling and oppressing women. EnfoFanm also led a campaign to name streets in Port-au-Prince after famous Haitian women to celebrate and commemorate their work as well as elevate the status of women within Haitian culture. Later in 2006, Merlet took part in creating the  Coordination Nationale pour le Plaidoyer des Femmes [National Coordination for Women’s Advocacy] and served as a spokesperson for the organization to fight against sexism within the public sector.  One of Merlet’s greatest accomplishments was leading the efforts to reclassify rape. Prior to 2005, rape was considered a “ crime of passion ” or an “ offense against morals ” in Haiti. Rape victims and their families seldom received monetary compensation from the perpetrators, and had no hope for a legal sentencing or justice for the victim. In large part thanks to the work of Merlet and many other women activists, rape has been reclassified as a criminal offense. However, there remains a lack of a precise definition of rape as well as strong judicial system to uphold and enforce the criminalization of rape. As a result, many rapes continue to be overlooked by authorities and there is a stark lack of rape prosecutions, leaving victims vulnerable and susceptible to further gender-based violence.  From 2006 to 2008 Merlet acted as the Chief of Staff to  Haiti’s Ministry for Gender and the Rights of Women . There, she continued to promote equal rights and end gender discrimination and violence. Though in a government position, Merlet continued to participate in grassroots advocacy and worked closely with the Minister for the Coordination of Women and Women’s Rights, Marie-Laurence Jocelyn Lassegue. Together, Merlet and Lassegue opened the first  Haiti Sorority Safe House and  V-Day Safe House , both of which act as safe houses for women who are victims of domestic violence. At both of these safe houses women can access medical, legal, and psychological aid as well as gain life skills through the business and computer training courses offered. There continues to be an overwhelming lack of safe houses and aid offered to victims of domestic and gender-based violence. Merlet and Lassegue’s work is carried on by organizations like Fanm Deside , but more needs to be done.  The earthquake served as a reminder of how crucial the work in which Merlet was involved continues to be. A report by  Amnesty International stated , “the displacements and living conditions in the displaced persons camps have increased the risk of facing gender-based violence for women and girls, while the destruction of police stations and court houses during the 2010 earthquake further weakened that state’s ability to provided adequate protection.” Women and girls living in the camps with poor lighting at night, unsecure tents, and limited police presence continue to be increasingly susceptible to rape and gender-based violence. Furthermore, the  child sex ring run by United Nations Peacekeepers exacerbated the sexual abuse women and girls faced in the camps in Port-au-Prince.  The work Merlet started for the promotion, empowerment, and protection of Haitian women’s rights at the grassroots level remains imperative. The UN’s debacle illustrates why women and local leaders must be involved in the disaster relief process and the need to bring female issues to the forefront of government policy in the hopes of strengthening the justice system to deter rape and gender-based violence as well as provided justice for female victims.  Up Next : Inspirational and Influential Women of the World: Sister Pauline Quinn coming April 20th      Read more                Trump Unhinged     Over the last few days Trump has been tweeting and fuming over a caravan of migrants crossing through Mexico. Some, not all, may try to gain access to the United States, seeking asylum from economic marginalization and political violence in Central America. Nearly 80% of the 1,200 caravan participants are from Honduras.  Caravans have been common in recent years, as people travel in larger groups to avoid trouble with gangs in Central America and Mexico. Until this year, these caravans gained little notice in the United States. But Trump is in trouble with scandals and desperate for a legislative victory. In this environment, he seems to be turning to what got him to the White House: Exaggerate, mislead, and outright lie about some facet of immigration law, or immigrants themselves, to rally support. Referencing the caravan, Trump is renewing calls for border wall funding, and has declared there will be no deal on DACA. In a tweet Sunday, Trump declared :  Border Patrol Agents are not allowed to properly do their job at the Border because of ridiculous liberal (Democrat) laws like Catch & Release. Getting more dangerous. “Caravans” coming. Republicans must go to Nuclear Option to pass tough laws NOW. NO MORE DACA DEAL!  Yesterday, Trump went even further, declaring that the U.S. would begin using the military to police the border. Quoted in the New York Times , Trump said:  We have very bad laws for our border, and we are going to be doing some things — I’ve been speaking with General Mattis — we’re going to be doing things militarily…Until we can have a wall and proper security, we’re going to be guarding our border with the military. That’s a big step. We really haven’t done that before, or certainly not very much before.  Trump’s latest tirade is political theater of the sort we’ve come to expect. Bombastic declarations that clutter the political space for compromise, all with the aim of getting a “deal.”  Withdrawing the U.S. from NAFTA, sending troops to the border, and refusing to bargain on DACA – when it was just a few weeks ago he encouraged such a bargain in exchange for funding for the wall and other reductions in immigration – are all on the surface losing propositions. Clearly he is trying to shake things up to force the hands of congress, while giving red meat to his Fox-News-watching supporters.  Along the southern border, crossings are at a near 40 year low. The last four administrations have built a legal framework on immigration that has granted enormous authority to ICE to arrest, detain, and deport millions of people. Far from being hamstrung, ICE has been given near free rein along the border. Federal prosecutors and judges are now forced to spend half of their caseloads prosecuting illegal entry and reentry violations, in an unnecessary dragnet that violates the most basic tenets of due process.  The only crisis in immigration right now is the inhumane treatment being meted out against people fleeing violence and economic collapse. While Trump’s rhetoric is theatrical, the results of his ongoing war on migrants is very real. We are facing a human rights crisis in this country of enormous proportions. Trump wants to make it worse. Congress will likely go along in some measure. We need to stop them.      Read more               Keep up to date on our latest actions    Thanks for signing up!  You can unsubscribe at any time using the Unsubscribe link at the bottom of every email.     Email      Sorry, we could not complete your sign-up. Please contact us to resolve this.    Operation timed out, please try again.   Susbcribe      Powered by Constant Contact |  Privacy             Our Projects     Quest for Peace      Haiti Reborn      Catholics Speak Out      Criminal Justice Reform      Quick Links     Publications      About Us      Financials      Blog      Contact Us    Quixote Center 7307 Baltimore Ave. Ste 214 College Park, MD 20740    Office: 301-699-0042 Email: info@quixote.org     Direction to office:  For driving: From Baltimore Ave (Route 1) towards University of Maryland, turn right onto Hartwick Rd. Turn immediate right in the office complex. Look for building 7307. We are located on the 2nd floor.  For public transportation: We are located near the College Park metro station (green line)          1998 - 2018 The Quixote Center. All rights Reserved. | Privacy Policy | Sitemap Designed By The Right Aid , Web design for nonprofits             Follow us:      Home About Us About Us Remembering Bill Callahan Our Team Our Board Our Financials Programs Programs Quest for Peace Haiti Reborn Catholics Speak Out Criminal Justice Reform Qommunity Actions Blog Contact      English    English Haitian Creole Spanish                         Original text Contribute a better translation Original text Contribute a better translation#^$